<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881129-0037 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-29-88.f2.A1036</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1915</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-047]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Safety Standards for Scaffolds Used in Shipyard Employment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Departmentof Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)proposes to revise the shipyard employment safety standards addressingscaffolds. The standards proposed for revision regulate the design, construction,and use of scaffolds in shipyards.The existing shipyard employment standards (29 CFR Part 1915) apply toshipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking operations and related employments.However, the present standards in Part 1915 are not comprehensive in theircoverage of shipyard hazards, and are supplemented by the general industrystandards (29 CFR Part 1910) as necessary to provide complete coveragefor all the hazards encountered in shipyards. This document is one of aseries of proposals which are intended to revise Part 1915 to provide comprehensivecoverage of shipyard employment solely within that part.This action will consolidate and update the shipyard employment scaffoldstandards and the appropriate general industry scaffold standards intoa single, comprehensive Part 1915 that would apply to all activities andareas in shipyards (except construction activities covered by Part 1926).The proposed provisions will delete many existing specification provisionswhich currently limit employer innovation, and where appropriate, use performance-orientedprovisions to address scaffold hazards.The specific topic of scaffolds is currently addressed in Subpart E ofthe current Shipyard Employment Standards, along with the topics of accessand egress, ladders, and other walking/working surface considerations.To format the rules into a more logical grouping of topics, this and relatedactions would retain coverage of ladders and other access and egress concernsin Subpart E, and would relocate fall protection and scaffolds from thecurrent Subpart E to a new Subpart M_Fall Protection, and a new SubpartN_Scaffolds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments on this proposed rulemaking must be postmarkedby February 27, 1989. Hearing requests must be postmarked by February 27,1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments and requests for a hearing should besent in quadruplicate to the Docket Office, Docket No. S-047, U.S. Departmentof Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Room N-2634, 200Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Materials in the rulemakingrecord are available for public inspection and copying at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. James Foster, Office of Informationand Consumer Affairs, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, U.S.Department of Labor, Room N-3647, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington,DC 20210, Telephone (202) 523-8151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The principal author of this noticeof proposed rulemaking is Roy F. Gurnham, Office of Construction and CivilEngineering Safety Standards, Occupational Safety and Health Administration.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background and Approach</ITAG>In May 1971, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration under authoritygranted by section 6(a) of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970(29 U.S.C. 655), adopted established Federal standards issued under section41 of the Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 941),as standards applicable to ship repairing (29 CFR Part 1915), shipbuilding(29 CFR Part 1916), and shipbreaking (29 CFR Part 1917) operations. Inaddition, OSHA adopted other Federal standards and national consensus standardsas general industry standards (29 CFR Part 1910) and construction industrystandards (29 CFR Part 1926) which were made applicable to hazards andworking conditions not specifically covered by Parts 1915, 1916, or 1917.On April 20, 1982, the ship repairing, shipbuilding, and shipbreaking standardswere consolidated into one Part 1915 of Title 29, Code of Federal Regulations,and titled ``Occupational Safety and Health Standards for Shipyard Employment''(47 FR 16984). The consolidation eliminated duplicate provisions and overlappingprovisions, but did not alter any substantive requirements. The consolidationdid not affect the applicability of general industry standards of 29 CFRPart 1910 to hazards or conditions in shipyard employments not specificallyaddressed in the consolidated Part 1915 (see 29 CFR 1910.5(c)(2)).In 1982, the Shipbuilders Council of America and the American WaterwaysShipyard Conference requested OSHA to identify the specific applicableprovisions of the general industry standards which apply to shipyards,and consolidate them with the existing Part 1915 provisions into a singleset of shipyard employment standards. OSHA has determined that such consolidationis appropriate. This and other proposed rulemakings will eventually incorporateall applicable Part 1910 provisions into the existing organization of Part1915. The present Part 1915 organizational format, which is already familiarto present users of the shipyard standards, provides a logical groupingof related provisions based on the type of work activity, hazard, or equipmentinvolved. However, when a regrouping of topics would facilitate understandingof the rules, or when applicable Part 1910 provisions have no counterpartin the existing Part 1915 structure, the proposals would create new subpartsor subpart headings in Part 1915. In addition to consolidating the provisions of Part 1910 and Part 1915,OSHA proposes to revise the consolidated provisions as appropriate. OSHAhas not substantively revised many of the current provisions in these Partssince they were promulgated in 1971. OSHA believes some provisions needto be revised to reflect technological advances. Other provisions needto be revised because they are based on national consensus standards issuedprior to 1971, and do not reflect the revisions made since that time. Asthe provisions are consolidated, all such revised consensus standards willbe reviewed, and OSHA's provisions revised as necessary to effectuate thepurposes of the standard and the OSH Act. Where practical, all currentincorporations by reference of national consensus standards and other materialswill be deleted by the proposed standards, and the text of all such requirementswill be proposed for inclusion in the body of the proposed standards, ortheir appendices. This approach is intended to assist employers in determiningwhat duties and obligations are imposed by a provision by minimizing theneed to refer to documents outside Part 1915. OSHA will also use the consolidationproject to replace specification requirements with performance-orientedrequirements where it is known that there is more than one way to providesafety equivalent to that provided by the present specification requirements.Specification requirements would be used only where necessary to set appropriatelimits and to clarify duties and obligations.The revision of the shipyard employment standards will be coordinated withefforts to revise parallel provisions in the construction and general industrystandards so that consistent coverage of hazards which are encounteredin these industry sectors can be provided.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary and Explanation of the Proposal</ITAG>Scaffolds are currently covered by 29 CFR Part 1915, Subpart E_Scaffolds,Ladders, and Other Working Surfaces, and 29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart D_Walking-WorkingSurfaces. Consolidation of these two subparts into one subpart would resultin a large, cumbersome subpart, because of the wide range of topics covered.Therefore, OSHA is proposing to divide the consolidated Part 1915 standardsinto three subparts. The proposed sub-parts would be Subpart E_Access andEgress; Subpart M_Fall Protection; and Subpart N_Scaffolds. This reformatting,in and of itself, would neither create nor delete any requirements.In accordance with paragraph 6(b)(8) of the Occupational Safety and HealthAct of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 655), the agency has reviewed the various nationalconsensus standards that cover working conditions dealt with in this proposal.Where appropriate, OSHA has incorporated provisions from those nationalconsensus standards as part of this proposal. OSHA believes that the proposedstandard will better effectuate the purposes of the Safety and Health Actof 1970 than the national consensus standards which have not been madea part of this proposal, because this proposal is more comprehensive andprovides greater flexibility in its requirements for safety. The followingdiscussion provides a more detailed explanation of the proposed provisionsrelated to scaffolds.Section 1915.251 Scope, application and definitions applicable to thissubpart.Proposed andSection; 1915.251(a) outlines the scope and application of SubpartN. The proposal would apply to all scaffolds used in all workplaces andoperations found in shipyards, including those aboard vessels and vesselsections (sub-assemblies of vessels), except that construction, alteration,repair (including painting and decorating), and demolition of shore facilitieswould continue to be addressed by 29 CFR Part 1926_Construction IndustryStandards. This proposal incorporates all applicable provisions of 29 CFR1910.28 and 1910.29 related to scaffolds, and those sections of Part 1910would no longer apply to shipyard workplaces and operations.The term ``scaffold'' is defined to mean any temporary elevated platform(supported or suspended) and its supporting structure used for supportingemployees or materials, or both. Included under this definition are craneand derrick suspended personnel platforms. The intent is to cover the hazardsassociated with scaffold work regardless of the style, purpose, or nameof the scaffold. For the purposes of this Subpart, scaffolds are dividedinto two categories: ``supported scaffolds'' and ``suspension scaffolds.''The standards in Subpart N are all intended to apply to both types of scaffolds,except where a provision is expressly limited to either suspension or supportedscaffolds. Scaffolds which have a combination of supported and suspendedcomponents would be covered by both sets of provisions.Proposed paragraph (b) of andSection; 1915.251 lists and defines all majorwords used in Subpart N. Many of the definitions are the same as thosein the existing standards, however some have been reworded for uniformityor clarity. One significant change made to all definitions defining thetypes of scaffolds is the inclusion of the words ``supported scaffold''and ``suspension scaffold,'' as appropriate. This change would clarifythe application of the general rules contained in andSection; 1915.252, someof which only apply to supported types of scaffolds and some of which onlyapply to suspension types of scaffolds. Another significant change involveslanguage in the existing definitions which goes beyond defining the termin question, and imposes substantive limitations or obligations on equipmentuse. Such language is more appropriately located in the substantive partsof the standards and not in the definitions. The proposal would removesuch provisions from the definitions and relocate them elsewhere in thestandards. For example, the existing definition from Subpart D for ``horsescaffolds'' is ``a scaffold for light or medium duty, composed of horsessupporting a work platform.'' The words `'for light or medium duty'' areproposed to be deleted from the definition because they have a substantivelimitation on the use of the scaffold, rather than serving to define thetype of scaffold. Similarly, the existing definition from Subpart D for``coupler'' is ``a device for locking together the component parts of atubular metal scafford. The material used for the coupler shall be of astructural type, such as a drop-forged steel, malleable iron, or structuralgrade aluminum. The use of gray cast iron is prohibited.'' Only the firstsentence of that definition describes what is meant by a ``coupler.'' Bycontrast, the second and third sentences impose substantive requirementson how a coupler must be constructed. Provisions such as these, which aresubstantive rather than definitional, are more appropriately located inthe substantive provisions of the standard.The following are the major terms which would be changed or added to thedefinitions in the proposed standard:``Adjustable suspension scaffold.'' This is a new definition and is usedin the proposal to clarify which types of suspension scaffolds are adjustable.As all types of suspended scaffolds can be erected at various heights,they might all be though of as ``adjustable.'' However, the proposed definitionexplains that the term ``adjustable suspension scaffold'' applies onlyto those types of scaffolds with hoists which can be operated by employeeson the scaffold. Hoists are defined as mechanical devices used to raiseor lower a suspended scaffold.``Body belt/harness system (personal fall arrest system). This term replacesthe existing term ``safety belt'' to reflect current industry use of thenew terms ``body belt system'' and ``body harness system'' (also knownas ``personal fall arrest systems'').``Capable person.'' This term is used to define the necessary competenciesand to be possessed by individuals assigned to perform specified tasksrequired by the proposed subpart. (See also the definition for ``qualifiedperson.'') Although not defined, Part 1910 presently uses the term ``competentperson'' to qualify the type of individual responsible for performing certainspecified duties. Part 1915 also uses the term ``competent person'' todescribe certain individuals, and the term is defined in andSection;1915.4(o).The existing Part 1915 definition is for unique shipyard situations andis not a suitable definition to use for the Part 1910 term when Part 1910provisions are combined with Part 1915 provisions. Therefore, where Part1910 provisions are included in this proposal, the term ``competent person''is replaced by the term ``capable person''. The proposed definition isbased on the existing definition for ``competent person'' used in the constructionsafety standards (29 CFR 1926.32(f)).``Catenary scaffold.'' This type of scaffold is not specifically addressedin the existing rules, however it is covered in proposed paragraph andSection;1915.253(n).The definition is essentially the same definition as is currently usedby the American National Standards Institute in ANSI A 10.8-1977. (Ref.1)``Cleat.'' The existing definition in Subpart D applies only to ladders.The proposed definition defines this word as it applies to scaffolds, i.e.,a structural member used to prevent plank slippage, and to provide footingon sloped surfaces such as crawling boards.``Dropline.'' This a piece of equipment used for body belt/harness supportin fall protection systems. It is not used to support scaffolds.``Equivalent.'' This term is used in the proposal to allow alternativemeans of complying with the standards. The definitions makes clear thatthe employer must demonstrate that the alternative means of compliancewill provide an equal or greater degree of safety than that attained byusing the methods or item specified in the standard.``Exposed power lines.'' This term is defined to mean electrical powerlines which are accessible and not shielded, and is used in paragraph andSection;1915.252(d)(6),which limits the use of scaffolds near exposed power lines. The definitionexcludes extension cords and power tool cords from that rule.``Fabricated decking and planking.'' The existing standard only addressesssolid sawn wood planking in many of its provisions. Since the market presentlyoffers laminated platforms, metal and non-metal decking, as well as solidsawn wood planking, the standard has been drafted to include these fabricateditems, and to sanction their use officially. The definition makes clearthat both fabricated and natural products are addressed.``Fabricated frame scaffold.'' This is the proposed name for the type ofscaffold presently identified as ``tubular welded frame scaffold.'' Thecurrent term is too restrictive in that the word ``tubular'' means round,and ``welded'' implies that metal components are involved. The rules inparagraph andSection;1915.253(c) are not dependent on such limitations. Theyaddress fabricated frames and related scaffold components whether the componentparts are square or round, and whether made of metal, plastic, wood, orsome other material.``Failure.'' This word is used in performance-oriented paragraphs suchas andSection;1915.252(a)(1) and 1915.252(a)(3) which address the capacitiesof scaffolds and scaffold components. The definition makes it clear that,along with breakage and separation of component parts, load refusal (theload point where the ultimate strength of a component is exceeded) is alsoconsidered to be failure. This is the point where structural members losetheir ability to carry loads.``Guardrail system.'' This term defines guardrails as vertical barrierserected to prevent employees from falling, and replaces the existing term``guardrail.'' The definition is changed because the existing Part 1910definition describes a toprail, a midrail, and a stairrail. However, thisis not appropriate as each of these rails has different performance criteria.The new definition makes it clear that the entire system, including toprail,midrail (or screen) and posts, is covered when guardrails are addressedin paragraph (e) of andSection;1915.252. In addition, the definition distinguishesbetween Type I guardrails_those capable of providing adequate fall protectionby themselves, and Type II guardrail systems_those which may be used onsuspended platforms as edge delineators and to prevent misstepping, butwhich do not provide adequate fall protection by themselves. Body belt/harnesssystems must be worn when Type II guardrails are used on suspension scaffoldsbecause of the reduced strength characteristics and lower toprail heightsof Type II systems.``Hoist.'' This definition clarifies that paragraphs relating to hoists,including paragraphs (b) (28), (29) and (30) of andSection;1915.252, applyonly to mechanisms used to elevate or lower suspension scaffolds, and donot apply to other types of material hoists.``Ladder stand.'' This is a term used in andSection;1915.252(c) and definesone kind of means-of-access which can be used with scaffolds.``Lean-to-scaffolds.'' This is a type of scaffold which gains its supportand stability by leaning into or against the object being worked on.``Lower levels.'' This term is used to describe the areas to which an employeecould fall. The definition does not apply to the surface from which theemployee could fall.``Mechanically-powered hoists.'' This is a new term and would define hoistswhich are powered by other than human energy.``Mobile scaffold.'' This proposed term replaces the existing term ``manually-propelledmobile scaffold'' because there are power drive units available to propelscaffolds, and the proposed standard addresses both manual and power drivesystems.``Multi-level suspended scaffold.'' The existing standard does not specificallyaddress suspended scaffolds with more than one platform level. This termin the proposed standard identifies such scaffold arrangements.``Open sides and ends.'' This proposed definition clarifies the applicationof paragraph (e)(1) of andSection;1915.252, which requires fall protection,by defining the hazard for which guarding would be required. In brief,a side or end is considered to be ``open'' if it is more than 14 inchesfrom a horizontal or vertical surface or a point of access. The 14-inchdimension in the definition is consistent with the provisions of proposedparagraphs (b)(4) and (c)(7) of andSection;1915.252.``Outrigger.'' This term, ``outrigger beam,'' and ``outrigger scaffold''are new definitions provided to explain the difference between these threesimilar terms. ``Platform.'' This term is used to refer to the horizontal work surfaceof a scaffold, regardless of its completion. The existing standard usesterms such as ``planking'' and ``planks,'' and consequently is ambiguousas to the use of other types of platforms such as decks or other fabricatedmaterials or units. ``Platform unit.'' The existing standard uses the term ``planks'' in manyof its provisions. This term commonly means ``solid sawn wood.'' However,some manufacturers of fabricated planks use the term ``planks'' to describetheir product. Furthermore, there are other types of structural membersand materials which can be used to build platforms and walkways. Therefore,the term ``platform unit'' is needed to clarify that the standards applyto all types of platforms and walkways, not just those made of solid sawnwood. ``Qualified person.'' This term is used to describe the necessary competenciesto be possessed by individuals assigned to perform specified tasks requiredby this proposal. (See also the definition for ``capable person.'') Thisterm is not defined in Subpart D. The proposed definition is, therefore,based on the existing definition used in the construction safety standards(29 CFR 1926.32(1)). ``Self-contained adjustable scaffolds.'' This type of scaffold, not specificallyaddressed in the existing standard, is an adjustable suspension scaffoldequipped with its own support frame and movable platform. It is, therefore,covered by the general rules for both supported scaffolds and suspendedscaffolds. ``Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffolds.'' This is the proposedname for the type of scaffold presently identified as ``wood trestle, andextension trestle ladders.'' This change mirrors ANSI's use of the newterm. ``Supported scaffold'' and ``Suspension scaffold.'' These terms are usedto define the two basic types of scaffolds. As discussed above, these termsclarify the application of the general rules in andSection;1915.252. ``Unstable objects.'' This term is used to describe those items which shallnot be used as scaffold base supports because they do not properly distributethe loads imposed on them. Such supports can break or become dislodged.Examples of such objects include barrels, boxes, bricks, blocks, and similaritems. This list is essentially the same as the one set forth in andSection;1910.28(a)(2).``Vertical pickup.'' This term defines the structural member addressedin andSection;1915.253(n)(1). ``Walkway.'' This term is used to describe platforms within a scaffoldwhich are used for access and not as work platforms. Section 1915.252 General requirements This section applies to all scaffolds, and contains most of the new rulesand changed provisions. To facilitate locating a particular rule, the rulesin this section have been grouped into five major subsections: capacity,construction, access, use, and fall protection. For purposes of clarification, those rules which apply only to certaintypes of scaffolds are so identified. For example, general rule (b)(14)of andSection;1915.252 would only apply to supported scaffolds, and the term``supported scaffold'' is used to indicate this. Similarly, general rule(b)(27) of andSection;1915.252 would only apply to suspension scaffolds.If a rule makes no distinction, such as general rule (b)(1) of andSection;1915.252,then it would apply to all scaffolds. <T3>Paragraph 1915.252(a)_Capacity. </T3>This proposed paragraph wouldset forth the minimum strength criteria for all scaffold components andconnections. The proposed requirements are substantively the same as existingcapacity provisions; however, the proposed language eliminates ambiguitiesand apparent inconsistencies. Paragraph (a)(1) of andSection;1915.252 would require each scaffold component,except suspension ropes and guardrails, to be capable of supporting withoutfailure its own weight and at least four times the maximum intended loadapplied or transmitted to that component. This is essentially the samerequirement as andSection;1910.28(a)(4), which requires that scaffolds andscaffold components ``Be capable of supporting without failure at leastfour times the maximum intended load,'' and andSection;1915.71(b)(1) whichrequires scaffolds and scaffolds components to ``be capable of supportingthe load they are designed to carry with a safety factor of four.'' However,as written, the existing requirements are inconsistent with andSection;1910.28(a)(22),which requires a safety factor of six for suspension ropes, and are ambiguousas to their application to andSection;andSection;1910.28(a)(3) and 1915.71(j),which govern guardrails. The proposed standard makes clear that the fourto one safety factor does not apply to suspension ropes or guardrails.The proposed paragraph also makes it clear that the four to one factorapplies to the load which is actually applied or transmitted to a component,and not to the total load placed on the scaffold. This is the same requirementas andSection;1915.71(b)(1), but is a change from andSection;1910.28(a)(4).As currently worded, andSection;1910.28(a)(4) requires that each component,regardless of its location, configuration, or the number of other componentssupporting the same load, be designed to support four times the maximumintended load (MIL). Literally interpreted, this could be read to requirethat a crossbrace on a supported scaffold be capable of supporting thesame load as a scaffold leg. That is, it must be sized to support fourtimes the MIL regardless of where the load is placed on the scaffold, andregardless that the function of a brace is to prevent sway and not directlyto support the MIL. The amount of MIL applied or transmitted to each componentdepends on its location on the scaffold, and the type and configurationof the scaffold system. On complicated systems, the services of an engineermay be required to determine the loads at a particular point. However,because some employers do not have an engineering staff, and because someemployers prefer to have a quick reference table from which a scaffoldcan be readily built (even if over-designed), the non-mandatory tablesand guidelines in Appendix A are provided and may be used as a startingpoint for designing scaffold systems. However, the guidelines do not provideall the information necessary to build a complete system, and the employeris still responsible for designing and assembling the components in sucha way that the completed system will meet the requirements of andSection;1915.252(a)(1).The tables and guidelines are the same as are presently provided throughoutexisting Subparts D and E. However, whereas the existing standards requirethe use of these tables and guidelines, the proposed standard does notrequire them. What would be required is that the scaffold meet the performancecriteria set forth in andSection;1915.252(a)(1). This allows design flexibilityto employers who desire to engineer their scaffold set-up, while also providinga partial solution for employers who either do not desire to or cannotengineer the systems that are to be used.   The tables in existing Subpart D (Tables D-7 through D-19), and SubpartE (Tables E-1, E-3 and E-4) provide detailed specifications for componentsused in scaffold construction. However, OSHA believes that the importantconsideration in scaffold design and construction is that the scaffoldsupport the MIL safely, with an adequate margin of safety, and not thatthe scaffold have a particular sized upright regardless of MIL size andplacement pattern. Consequently, the proposal would relocate all scaffoldrelated tables currently in andSection;andSection; 1910.28 and 1915.118, includingthe table in andSection; 1910.28(a)(9) governing maximum span distance, toAppendix A, and would not make the tables mandatory. Similarly, existingparagraphs such as andSection; 1910.28(a)(8), which specifies minimum gradestress for lumber used; andSection; 1910.28(c) (1), (2), (3) and (4), whichspecify tube size and maximum tube and coupler scaffold heights; and andSection;1915.71(f)(11)(iii)-(iv), which specify minimum component sizes for laddertype suspension scaffolds, also would be relocated to Appendix A. The relocationof existing tables and specification language does not reduce the levelof safety presently provided by the existing requirements. OSHA believesthe proposed capacity requirements of paragraph andSection; 1915.252(a) providethe same level of safety as the existing standard. The existing specificationtables and paragraphs are engineered partial ways of complying with theprovision which requires a four to one factor of safety. Relocating thesetables and paragraphs to Appendix A will retain these criteria as examplesof acceptable partial solutions, and will eliminate the interpretationthat these specified provisions are the only acceptable ways of buildinga particular type scaffold. Paragraph (a)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would clarify that the factor ofsafety of four to one also applies to direct connections to floors, roofs,hulls, and decks, and to counterweight systems. Paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that suspension ropesbe capable of supporting six times the MIL, and is essentially the sameas andSection; 1910.28(a)(22). In addition, paragraph (a)(4)(i) would requirerope to be sized so that sufficient rope surface area is available forthe proper functioning of brake and hoist mechanisms used on suspensionscaffolds. Paragraph (a)(4)(ii) would specify minimum rope strength forcatenary scaffolds and is based on ANSI A10.8-1977, paragraph 22.2. Paragraph(a)(4)(iii), which specifies minimum rope strength for float and needlebeam scaffolds, is the same as paragraphs (n)(2) and (u)(5) of andSection;1910.28.<T3>Paragraph 1915.252(b)_Construction. </T3>Proposed paragraph (b)(1)of andSection; 1915.252 would require all platforms, except walkways, tobe fully decked or planked. Paragraph (b)(1) would clarify the provisionsof andSection; 1910.28(a)(3), which requires guardrails on all open sidesand ends of scaffolds, and andSection; 1915.71(j)(1), which is unclear asto where guardrails are required. OSHA has interpreted these existing provisionsto mean that guardrails must be erected as close as possible to the edgeof the platform planking. As guardrails normally can be conveniently attachedonly at the scaffold uprights, OSHA to date has required the platformsto be sized such that there is no gap between the outermost plank edgeand the guardrail. However, most prefabricated end frames do not have alateral spacing between uprights which can accommodate an integral numberof standard-sized-commercially-available planks. Therefore, to comply withthe existing rule, the last plank has to be cut to size, notched, or slanted.These modifications can lead to a significant reduction in plank strength,possibly cause tipping of the plank (sideways) when it is stepped on, orpose a tripping or stepping hazard. Therefore, to address this problem,the proposed rule would modify the existing requirement by requiring thespan between uprights to be planked or decked as fully as possible, butwould allow up to nine and one-half inches between the planking or deckingand the guardrail supports. Nine and one-half inches would be the maximumallowable open space, as spaces larger than this can be filled with a standardsized platform unit (defined as individual wood planks, fabricated planks,fabricated decks, and fabricated platforms) without modification. The proposedrule also recognizes that some side warpage (as opposed to twist warpage)may occur to individual planks, and andSection; 1915.252(b)(1)(i) would allowa maximum one-inch gap between platform units. When side brackets are usedto extend the width of a platform, a gap would be permitted in the platformto accommodate the presence of the scaffold uprights. Paragraph (b)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would specify a minimum width of18 inches for all platforms, except platforms used on ladderjacks and boatswain'schairs. This would not require each platform unit to be at least 18 incheswide. Rather, it would require only that the entire platform, which ismade up of one or more platform units, be at least 18 inches wide. OSHAbelieves 18 inches is the minimum safe width for scaffolds; however, theprovision would allow ladderjack scaffold platforms to be as narrow as12 inches wide. The smaller size for ladderjack scaffolds would be madebecause the difficulty of handling one 18-inch wide plank or two nine-inchplanks on a ladder is considered by OSHA to be more hazardous than workingon one 12-inch wide platform. However, because the narrowness of the 12-inchplatform could cause an employee to misstep, the proposal would requirebody belt/harness systems to be used on ladderjacks, whereas the existingstandard requires no fall protection. The existing requirement specifyinga minimum size for boatswain's chair seats is proposed to be deleted asmany chairs use slings or molded seats, and such a requirement is too restrictive.Paragraph (b)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of emergencydescent devices as working platforms. These devices are not designed forrepeated in-place use. However, this provision is not intended to precludethe use of scaffold systems which have as an additional feature the capacityto function as an emergency descent device. Paragraph (b)(4) of andSection; 1915.252 would limit to 14 inches the distancethat a platform may be away from the face of the structure being workedon, unless Type I guardrails or body belt/harness systems are used. (Anexception to the 14-inch limit is made for outrigger scaffolds, which arelimited to a distance of three inches, the same as required by andSection;1910.28(e)(4)). The existing rule, andSection; 1910.28(a)(3), requires guardrailson all open sides and ends of a scaffold platform, but does not specifyhow far away a scaffold platform may be from a structure before the sidefacing the structure is considered to be an ``open side.'' The existingrule has often been interpreted to mean that no open space is allowed.However, zero clearance is not always practicable. The proposed 14-inchlimit is based on a study by Wang (Ref. 2), and is similar to provisionsbeing developed for the construction and general industry standards. Thedistance from frame to wall may be any distance as long as the platformto wall space is no more than 14 inches. This can be done easily with theuse of side brackets or extensions on supported scaffolds, and by angulatedroping, static lines, or equivalent means on suspension scaffolds. Paragraph (b)(5) of andSection; 1915.252 would require platform units toextend a minimum of six inches beyond each end support so that they donot slip off their end supports when under load. This is the same as andSection;1910.28(a)(13) and andSection; 1915.71(i)(3). However, cleats would be allowedin lieu of a six-inch overhang because of their ability to prevent platformunits from slipping off the end supports. Paragraph (b)(6) of andSection; 1915.252 would change the maximum overhangallowed by andSection; 1915.71(i)(3) from 12 inches to 18 inches, the sameas allowed by andSection; 1910.28(a)(13). This modification is made becausemany planks in use are 10 feet long and are used to span eight-foot distances.The existing rule requires these planks to be perfectly centered. Thisis an unnecessary requirement because the minimum overhang required isonly six inches. In addition, because the proposed 18-inch limit, strictlyinterpreted, would require platform units to be cut if they extend morethan 18 inches past their end supports, the rule provides that the overhangmay exceed 18 inches if the extended portion is designed, capable, andinstalled to support employees without tipping, or is guarded to preventemployee access. This modification is consistent with the intent of andSection;1915.71(i)(3), which also allows additional platform overhang.Paragraph (b)(7) of andSection; 1915.252 would require proper support forabutting platform units. This provision is based on andSection; 1910.28(b)(12),which applies only to wood pole scaffolds. However, OSHA believes thatproper platform support is necessary for all scaffolds, and, therefore,the proposal would apply to all scaffolds. Abutted platform units do notrest one on another, but instead are end-to-end. Consequently, one unitdoes not support the other, and proper support can only be provided byseparate bearers, butt plates, or equivalent supports specifically designedto support the ends of abutted units.Paragraph (b)(8) of andSection; 1915.252 would require overlapped platformsto be overlapped a minimum of 12 inches. This would be the same requirementas andSection; 1910.28(a)(11), except the proposed rule also requires overlapsto occur over supports and not between supports.Pargraph (b)(9) of andSection; 1915.252 is taken from andSection; 1910.28(b)(13)for wood pole scaffolds, and prescribes the proper placement of platformunits for maximum safety at corners or other changes in scaffold direction.OSHA proposes that this is a valid consideration for all scaffolds, andnot just wood pole scaffolds.Paragraph (b)(10) of andSection; 1915.252 is proposed to assure that structuraldefects in platform units are not covered from view by the use of an opaquecoating or finish. Hairline cracks can significantly reduce the strengthof a wood member and their early detection is important. Opaque finishescan cover such cracks and make them difficult to discover. Unit edges areexcepted from this rule to allow identification marks, grading marks, orother similar type of marks to be placed on the unit edges, and specialcoatings to minimize contamination may be placed on platform units usedin reactor plants.Paragraph (b)(11) of andSection; 1915.252, prohibiting random combinationsof scaffold components, is proposed because of the many inferior scaffoldsystems which can result when the products of two different manufacturersare indiscriminately assembled together. Many such combinations resultin scaffolds which are not in alignment or are not plumb, and which, therefore,do not properly carry or distribute the loads imposed on the scaffolds.However, some units can be intermixed with no problem and the proposedlanguage, therefore, does not prohibit all such combinations. However,the parts must fit together without force, and if parts are modified inorder to intermix them, a capable person must determine that the resultingscaffold is structurally sound (no makeshift connections to facilitatethe mixing of mismatched pieces).Paragraph (b)(12) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of scaffoldcomponents made of dissimilar metals unless a capable person has determinedthat the resulting galvanic action will not significantly reduce any component'sstrength. This is a new rule, and is based on a similar rule developedfor the construction industry. Scaffolds which remain erected for longperiods of time, such as during the construction or repair of a large vessel,are subject to corrosion caused by dissimilar metals used in various scaffoldcomponents. This condition can be aggravated in the sea air conditionsof shipyards. The proposed rule would not prohibit all uses of dissimilarmetals as there are many combinations which do not produce significantgalvanic reactions.Paragraph (b)(13) of andSection; 1915.252 would require the stabilizationof all supported scaffolds when their height to base width (including outriggers,if any) ratio exceeds four to one. This rule is taken from andSection; 1910.29(a)(3)which applies only to manually-propelled mobile scaffolds. However, thedanger of a scaffold toppling because its center-of-gravity is too highis a problem with all supported scaffolds. Therefore, OSHA believes thatthe four to one ratio should apply to all supported scaffolds. Paragraph(b)(13)(i) would require ties, guys, or bracing at heights not to exceedthe first multiple in height of the four to one ratio, and at 20-foot maximumintervals thereafter above the first tie, guy or brace. The following areexamples of how this rule would be applied: (a) If a scaffold is five feetwide and 18 feet high, no ties, guys, or braces would be required becausethe heightis less than four times the width; (b) if the scaffold is fivefeet wide and 60 feet high, ties, guys, or braces would be required atleast at the 20-, 40- and 60-foot levels; and (c) if the scaffold is fivefeet wide, 60 feet high, and the contractor ties, guys, or braces the scaffoldat the 10-foot level, then ties, guys or braces also would be requiredat least at the 30- and 50-foot levels, and no ties, guys, or braces wouldbe required at the very top since the 60-foot level is only 10 feet abovethe last intermediate level tie, guy or brace (at 50 feet).Paragraph (b)(13)(ii) of andSection; 1915.252 which specifies the horizontalspacing for ties, guys, and braces, is based on andSection;andSection; 1910.28(b)(4), (c)(13), and (d)(9). The existing rules require pole scaffolds,tube and coupler scaffolds, and fabricated frame scaffolds to be tied andbraced at 26 feet vertically (25 feet for wood pole scaffolds) and 30 feethorizontally (25 feet for wood pole scaffolds). These existing rules areoften misinterpreted to mean that scaffolds less than 26 feet high (25feet for wood pole scaffolds) do not need guys, ties, or braces. Proposedparagraph (b)(13)(ii) would replace the 26- and 25-foot limits with a requirementthat all scaffolds required to have guys, ties, or braces, would have tohave such connections installed at each end of the scaffold and at horizontalintervals not to exceed 30-feet (measured from one end only). The 30 footlimit is the same as the existing limit on horizontal spacing containedin andSection; 1910.28 (c)(13) and (d)(9), and would replace the 25-footlimit of andSection; 1910.28(b)(4). The following are examples of how thisrule would be applied: (a) If a scaffold is five feet wide, 18 feet highand 50 feet long, no vertical or horizontal ties and braces would be requiredbecause the height is less than four times the width and the four to onerule does not require connections; (b) if the scaffold is five feet wide,50 feet high, and 25 feet long, ties and braces would be required at leastthe 20- and 40-foot levels at both ends of the scaffold (four ties andbraces in all); (c) if the scaffold is five-feet wide, 50-feet tall, and70-feet long, ties and braces would be required at least at the 20- and40-foot levels. These would be installed starting from either end, at leastat the zero, 30-, 60-, and 70-foot horizontal distances (eight ties andbraces in all).Paragraph (b)(14) of andSection; 1915.252 would consolidate rules andSection;andSection;1910.28 (a)(2), (b)(1), (c)(7), (d)(4), (e)(1), and (l)(7), all of whichrequire that scaffolds rest upon a stable, firm, level footing. This isnot a new requirement, although the language is changed for purposes ofclarity and uniformity.Paragraph (b)(15) of andSection; 1915.252 would consolidate rules andSection;andSection;1910.28 (a)(14), (b)(1), (c)(7), 1910.29 (b)(2), (d)(3), and 1915.71 (c)(1)and (d)(3), all of which require that uprights be secure, plumb, and bracedto prevent swaying and displacement of the scaffold. This is not a newrequirement, although the language is changed for purposes of clarity anduniformity.Paragraph (b)(16) of andSection; 1915.252 is the first of the paragraph (b)rules which specifically address suspension scaffolds. This proposed rulerequires suspension support devices to rest on surfaces capable of supportingthe suspension scaffold. It is based on andSection; 1910.28(f)(10), and addressesthe problem of adequate support for the scaffold system. It is the suspensionscaffold equivalent of proposed rule (b)(14), which requires firm footingfor supported scaffolds. Although the existing rule applies only to mason'sadjustable multiple-point suspension scaffolds, OSHA believes that properoutrigger support is a concern for all suspension scaffolds.Paragraphs (b) (17), (18) and (19) of andSection; 1915.252 would set forthconditions required for the use of outrigger beams, but would not requirethat such beams be used on suspension scaffolds. Paragraph (b)(17) wouldrequire beams to be made of structural metal and to be restrained to preventmovement. This is the same requirement as andSection;andSection; 1910.28 (f)(4)and (i)(10), except OSHA proposes to apply the rule to all scaffolds supportedby outrigger beams. Paragraph (b)(18) would require stabilizing the inboardends of outrigger beams by direct connections to the floor, roof, or deckor by the use of counterweights. This rule clarifies andSection; 1910.28(h)(5)which requires only that outriggers be securely fastened or anchored. Counterweightsare not addressed in the existing standard, and the proposal corrects thisoversight. Counterweights are often the only way to anchor a scaffold withoutdamage to the supporting floor, deck, or other support. Paragraph (b)(18)(i) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that direct connectionsbe evaluated by a capable person to insure that the roof or floor deckis capable of supporting the loads to be imposed. Paragraph (b)(18)(ii)would require that counterweights be made of solid material, and, in effect,prohibits the practice of using sandbags or water-filled buckets as counterweights.Such counterweights are easily displaced and may leak. Paragraph (b)(18)(iii)would require counterweights to be mechanically attached to the outriggerbeam. This provision would help protect against accidental counterweightdisplacement. Paragraph (b)(18)(iv) would prohibit the removal of counterweightsfrom a scaffold until the scaffold is disassembled. This new rule is alsointended to prevent scaffolds from being improperly balanced. Paragraph(b)(18)(v) would require outrigger beams to be tied back as an additionalmeans of anchorage. This new provision would provide a back-up system incase the counterweights become displaced. Although tiebacks alone may notkeep a scaffold from tipping, they will keep the system from falling tothe ground and from causing a progressive failure of nearby scaffolds andscaffold sections. Vents, standpipes, other piping systems, and electricalconduits are not acceptable points of anchorage for tie-backs because theyare often made of materials that cannot support the loads that would beimposed on them if a counterweight system were to fail. Paragraphs (b)(18)(vi) and (vii) would specify how tiebacks are to be installed.Paragraph (b)(19) of andSection; 1915.252 would specify the constructionrequirements for outrigger beams. Paragraph (b)(19)(i) is based on andSection;1910.28 (f)(9) and (h)(5), and would require stop bolts or shackles ateach end of the beam to prevent the beam, as well as anything supportedfrom the beam, from coming off the beam or beam support. Paragraph (b)(19)(ii)would allow the use of channel beams in lieu of ``I'' beams, provided theyare fastened together with their flanges turned out. Paragraph (b)(19)(iii)is a new rule and would require that outrigger beams be installed withall bearing supports installed perpendicular to the beam centerline. Thiswould help prevent tipping of the beam due to any eccentric loading. Paragraph(b)(19)(iv) would require all outrigger beams to be used with their webin a vertical position. This provision is based on andSection; 1910.28 (f)(8)and (h)(5). Paragraph (b)(19)(v) would specify the correct alignment forsteel shackles, clevices, and the hoisting drum when single outriggersare used. This provision is the same as andSection; 1910.28(f)(13).Paragraph (b)(20) of andSection; 1915.252 would address the types of supports,other than outrigger beams, used to suspend suspension scaffolds. Paragraph(b)(2o)(i) would require that support devices such as cornice hooks, roofhooks, roof irons, and parapet clamps, be made of mild steel or equivalentmaterial, and is the same as andSection;andSection; 1910.28(g)(4) and 1915.71(f)(1).Paragraph (b)(20)(ii) is a new rule and would require the use of bearingblocks to spread loads. Paragraph (b)(20)(iii) would require the use oftiebacks, the same as andSection; 1910.28(g)(4). The proposal, however, wouldspecify in paragraph (b)(20)(iv) that the tiebacks must be equivalent instrength to the hoisting ropes. The tiebacks must be as strong as the hoistingropes as they may have to support the scaffold in the event of a scaffoldhoist rope failure. Vents, standpipes, other piping systems, and electricalconduits are not acceptable points of anchorage because they are oftenmade of materials that cannot support the loads that would be imposed onthem if the support device were to fail. Paragraph (b)(21) of andSection; 1915.252 would specify the minimum lengthof suspension rope to be used at each installation. The proposal is basedon rules andSection; 1910.28 (f)(12) and (h)(7), with the clarification thateither the rope shall be long enough to allow the scaffold to be loweredto the next level without the rope end passing through the hoist, or therope shall be configured or provided with a means to prevent its end frompassing through the hoist. OSHA believes this provision will prevent accidentalrunthrough of the suspension rope.Paragraph (b)(22) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of repairedwire ropes as suspension ropes. This is a new requirement and is basedon OSHA's view that there is no way to determine the strength capacityof a repaired wire rope without the danger of over-stressing the repairand thus rendering the rope unsafe for use on scaffolds. This provisiondoes not prohibit joining together two or more pieces of wire rope as allowedby paragraph (b)(23) of andSection; 1915.252.Paragraph (b)(23) of andSection; 1915.252 would allow suspension ropes tobe joined together only by the use of eye splices with shackles, or coverplatesand bolts. This would be a new requirement and is based on similar rulesbeing developed by ANSI in the current review of the A10.8 scaffold standards.These are the only acceptable ways to connect wire ropes without affectingtheir strength capacities.Paragraph (b)(24) of andSection; 1915.252 would require the load ends ofwire suspension ropes to be equipped with proper size thimbles, and tobe secured by eye splicing or equivalent means. This requirement is basedon andSection; 1920.28 (f)(12) and (h)(9).Paragraph (b)(25) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of defectiveor damaged ropes, and is based on andSection; 1910.28(u)(5) which prohibitsdamaged ropes from being used on float or ship scaffolds. Like the otherrules discussed in this section, this rule is proposed to apply to allsuspended scaffolds. The danger of a broken line is a problem not confinedto float or ship scaffolds.Paragraph (b)(26) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that swaged attachmentsor spliced eyes on wire suspension ropes be used only if they are madeby the wire rope manufacturer or a qualified person. This would be a newrequirement and is based on similar rules being developed by ANSI in thecurrent review of the A10.8 scaffold standard.Paragraph (b)(27) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that wire rope clipsbe retightened after the initial loading and periodically thereafter. Suchclips can work loose under cyclic loading and should not be assumed tobe properly tightened without being checked on a regular basis.Paragraph (b)(28) or andSection; 1915.252 would require that scaffold hoists,both mechanically-powered and manually-powered, be of a type approved bya nationally recognized testing laboratory. This provision is a consolidationof existing provisions in andSection; 1910.28 (f)(2), (g)(3), (h)(2), and(i)(1).Paragraph (b)(29) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of gasoline-poweredhoists on suspension scaffolds, and is based on OSHA's belief that gasolinehoists present fire hazards which are not acceptable given the confinedarea of a scaffold. Timely escape from a fire could be very difficult,and perhaps impossible, if the hoist is incapacitated.Paragraph (b)(30) of andSection; 1915.252 would require mechanically-poweredoperated gears and brakes to be enclosed, and is the same requirement asandSection; 1910.28(i)(3).Paragraph (b)(31) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that an automaticbraking device or locking pawl be provided, in addition to the normal operatingbrake, to slow hoist when its normal speed of descent (as recommended bythe hoist manufacturer) is exceeded. This is the same requirement as andSection;1910.28(i)(4), except the proposed requirement would apply to manually-poweredhoists as well as mechanically-powered hoists.Paragraph (b)(32) of andSection; 1915.252 would provide that where manually-poweredhoists are used, the scaffold shall not be capable of being lowered withouta positive crank force being applied to the hoist. This is a new requirementand is based on OSHA's view that it will eliminate the dangerous conditionof ``free-running'' hoists during descents. OSHA requests comments andsupporting information on the need for this requirement.<T3>Paragraph 1915.252(c)_Access. </T3>Paragraphs (c) (1) through (6) ofandSection; 1915.252 set forth the requirements for safe access to scaffolds.They are intended to clarify the requirement of andSection; 1910.28(a)(12),which requires ``an access ladder or equivalent safe access shall be provided,''and to consolidate this requirement with andSection; 1915.71(k). However,these provisions would not apply to employees performing scaffold erectionand dismantling operations because such rules are not feasible until ascaffold has been erected and properly braced.Paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.252 provides that access to and betweenscaffolds more than two feet above or below the point of access shall beby certain specified means. These means of access are the same as are presentlyrecognized by ANSI and other consensus groups. The two-foot limit is achange from andSection; 1915.71(k)(1), which has a five-foot limit. Thischange is made because if one of the specified methods of access listedin paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.252 is not provided until scaffoldsare more than five feet above their supporting surface, then the only wayof access is by climbing the crossbraces, and, as noted below, this isnot recognized as a proper means of access. In addition, the proposed provisionallows the use of some types of access which are not presently recognizedby existing standards, but which OSHA believes are safe means of access.These include integral prefabricated rungs, hook-on and attachable laddersdesigned for use with manufactured-types of scaffolds, and direct accessfrom other scaffolds, structures, personnel hoists, or similar surface.However, the paragraph prohibits the use of crossbracing as a means ofaccess. OSHA believes that crossbraces do not provide adequate footingsor handholds as they are not designed nor intended to serve as a meansof access.Paragraph (c)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would set forth the conditions requiredfor the use of portable, hook-on, and attachable ladders as means of access.Paragraph (c)(2)(i) would require portable, hook-on, and attachable laddersto be positioned so as not to tip the scaffold. This is based on existingmobile scaffold rule andSection; 1910.29(a)(3)(viii). Paragraph (c)(2)(ii)would require ladders to be positioned such that it is not necessary foremployees to step more than one foot from the ladder to any intermediatelanding or platform. This is the same rule a andSection; 1915.71(k)(3). Paragraph(c)(2)(iii) would require that the bottom rung of hook-on and attachableladders be not more than 24 inches above the scaffold supporting level.This would allow scaffolds to be leveled and adjusted without constantlyadjusting the ladder, up to a maximum of 24 inches. Paragraph (c)(2)(iv)would require landing platforms be provided at 20-foot maximum verticalintervals for hook-on and attachable ladders. The proposal does not requireladders to be offset every 20 feet, or that a landing be provided on theladder itself. It would simply require that rest platforms be placed notmore than 20 feet apart. Existing work platforms or walkways which arealready part of the scaffold could be used to meet this requirement. OSHArequests comments and supporting information on the need for this requirement.Paragraph (c)(2)(v) would require hook-on and attachable ladders to bespecifically designed for use with the manufactured types of scaffoldsto be used to insure compatibility. Paragraphs (c)(2) (vi) and (vii) wouldspecify minimum rung length and maximum rung spacing for hook-on and attachableladders.Paragraph (c)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would set forth the conditions requiredfor the use of stairway-type ladders as means of access. Paragraphs (c)(3)(i) and (ii) are similar to paragraphs (c)(2)(ii) and (iii) above. Paragraph(c)(3)(iii) would require a minimum step length of 16 inches, and is basedon andSection; 1910.29(a)(3)(ii). Paragraph (c)(3)(iv) would require slip-resistanttreads on all stairs and landings. This rule is based on general industryrule andSection; 1910.29(a)(3)(iv) which requires the steps to be fabricatedfrom slip-resistant treads; however, the proposal would allow the use ofother means to obtain the required surface, such as slip-resistant coatings.Paragraph (c)(3)(v) would require stairway-type ladders to be equippedwith stairrails and handrails.Paragraph (c)(4) of andSection; 1915.252 would require ramps and runwaysto be provided with guardrails which meet the criteria set forth in proposedSubpart M_Fall Protection for Shipyard Employment. Paragraph (c)(5) ofandSection; 1915.252 sets forth the conditions required for the use of integralprefabricated scaffold rungs as means of access. Paragraph (c)(5)(i) wouldrequire that such rungs be specifically designed and constructed for useas rungs. That is, they must be capable of supporting ladder-type loads.Paragraph (c)(5)(ii) would require rungs to be at least 11\1/2\ incheslong to provide adequate footing, and paragraph (c)(5)(iii) would requirethat rungs be uniformly spaced. These are the same requirements as forother types of ladders (see Notice of Proposed Rulemaking for Subpart E_Accessand Egress). Paragraph (c)(5)(iv) would require rest platforms at 20-footmaximum vertical intervals, the same as (c)(2)(iii) above. Paragraph (c)(5)(v)would require a maximum spacing between rungs of 16\1/2\ inches, and isconsistent with the provisions of proposed Subpart E.Paragraph (c)(6) of andSection; 1915.252 would require all rungs and stepsto line up vertically with each other between rest platforms. This is toassure that a continuous climbing surface is provided. Employees descendinga scaffold can misstep if rungs and steps are offset. An example of thisis the use of integral rungs on frame scaffolds. If the frames are notoriented in the same direction (i.e., ladder rungs all on the same side)a non-continuous ladder surface will result which can cause a misstep.Paragraph (c)(7) of andSection; 1915.252 sets forth the conditions requiredfor direct access from another surface to a scaffold. Direct access maybe made only when the two surfaces are not more than 14 inches apart horizontally,and 24 inches apart vertically. The 14-inch dimension is based on proposedrule andSection; 1915.252(b)(4). The 24-inch dimension is based on proposedrule andSection; 1915.252(b)(4). The 24-inch dimension is consistent withsimilar provisions in the other paragraphs in paragraph (c) discussed above.<T3>Paragraph 1915.252(d)_Use. </T3>This paragraph addresses the use ofscaffolds and the activities which take place on scaffolds.Paragraph (d)(1) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the overloading ofa scaffold. This requirement clarifies and consolidates andSection;andSection;1910.28 (a)(7), (f)(1), (g)(9), (h)(1), (q)(6), (r)(3), (u)(1), and andSection;1915.71(f)(8), and complements proposed rule of andSection; 1915.252(a)(1)which requires that scaffolds be capable of supporting four times the maximumintended load without failure. This rule insures that the scaffold's capacityis not exceeded.Paragraph (d)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of shoreor lean-to scaffolds, and is the same provision as andSection; 1910.28(a)(24).Paragraph (d)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would require supported scaffoldsto be inspected for visible defects periodically, and after any occurrencewhich could affect the scaffold's structural integrity. Examples of suchoccurrences are impact loadings caused by vehicles, hoists, extremely highwinds, or any other event which places large stresses on the system. Thisrule would also require the inspection of suspension scaffolds for visibledefects immediately after installation prior to their first use; periodicallythereafter (preferably before each use); and after any occurrence whichcould affect a scaffold's structural integrity. Inspection of suspensionscaffolds is presently required by andSection;andSection; 1910.28 (g)(8), (i)(6),and 1915.71(f)(3), which require inspections only of certain types of suspensionscaffolds; however, OSHA believes all suspension scaffolds should be inspected.In the Specific Issues section of this preamble, OSHA requests public commenton the frequency of inspection and on the qualifications needed by theemployee doing the inspecting.Paragraph (d)(4) of andSection; 1915.252 would require the bracing, or removaluntil repaired, of all scaffold components which have been damaged or weakenedsuch that their strength has been reduced to less than that required byparagraph (a)(1) of andSection; 1915.252. This requirement clarifies andconsolidates existing requirements in andSection;andSection; 1910.28 (a)(6),(m)(6), and andSection; 1915.71(b)(5). Bracing would be allowed as the removalof a damaged component may not be possible without complete disassemblyof the scaffold.Paragraph (d)(5) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the movement of scaffoldswhile employees are on them, except that mobile scaffolds may be movedunder certain specified conditions. This rule combines the provisions ofexisting rules andSection; 1915.28(a)(5) and andSection; 1910.29 with respectto moving scaffolds when they are occupied.Paragraph (d)(6) of andSection; 1915.252 would restrict the use of scaffoldsnear exposed and energized electric power lines. This is a new requirementfor shipyard employment, and is based on similar provisions developed forthe use of scaffolds in the construction industry. OSHA believes theserules are equally applicable to the shipyard environment. Paragraphs (d)(6)(i) and (ii) prohibit the use of scaffolds closer than 10 feet to all energizedlines of 300 volts or more, even if the lines are insulated. Paragraph(d)(6)(iii) allows scaffolds to be used within two feet of energized linesless than 300 volts, provided the lines are insulated. Paragraph (d)(6)(iv)prohibits the use of scaffolds closer than 10 feet to all energized uninsulatedlines, of any voltage, which are exposed (not covered or guarded from contactby employees). OSHA believes these clearances would allow work to be performedsafely without the need for power lines to be deenergized.Paragraph (d)(7) andSection; 1915.252 would allow scaffolds to be erected,moved, dismantled, or altered only under the supervision of a capable person.It is the same requirement as andSection; 1915.71(b)(7)..Paragraph (d)(8) of andSection; 1915.252 would clarify the provision of andSection;1910.28(a)(19) regarding work on slippery scaffold platforms. The proposalstates that no work shall take place on slippery platforms except to removethe hazard.Paragraph (d)(9) of andSection; 1915.252 would require the use of tag linesor similar measures to stabilize swinging loads being hoisted onto scaffoldsor near scaffolds where the load could damage or impact the scaffold. Thisis based on andSection; 1910.28(a)(15) which requires tag lines when loadsare being hoisted onto the scaffold. The proposal would extend the provisionto cover other hoisting operations as the hazard being guarded againstis the same, regardless of the destination of the load.Paragraph (d)(10) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that suspension ropesbe shielded from harm caused by heat-producing processes, and shielded,treated, or otherwise protected when acids and other corrosive substancesare used on a scaffold. This requirement is essentially the same as andSection;1910.28(a) (21) and (27) which require that only treated or protected fiberor synthetic ropes be used near corrosive substances and that ``specialprecautions shall be taken'' when heat-producing processes are used onscaffolds. This provision modifies andSection; 1915.71(b)(8) which prohibitswelding, burning, riveting or open flame work on scaffolds supported byfiber rope. The proposal recognizes that shields can be used to protectsuspension ropes during such work. Public comment is requested, however,on what criteria, if any, should be set forth for such shields.Paragraph (d)(11) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit work on scaffoldsduring storms or when wind speeds exceed 40 mph, unless body belt/harnesssystems are worn or wind screens are erected. This requirement is basedon andSection; 1910.28(a)(18). The existing rule prohibits all work on scaffolds``during storms or high winds.'' Public comment is requested in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble on whether the 40 mph limit is appropriate,and what other methods are available to protect employees from high winds.Paragraph (d)(12) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit accumulation ofdebris on scaffold platforms and is based on andSection; 1910.28(a)(20).Paragraph (d)(13) of andSection; 1915.252 would prohibit the use of laddersor makeshift devices on scaffolds to raise the working level of employees.This would be a new provision and would assure that workers are providedwith a secure work platform, and would eliminate the hazard of tippingcaused by portable ladders exerting a sideways thrust on scaffold systems.Paragraph (d)(14) of andSection; 1915.252 would limit the degree to whichplatform units could deflect under load. This is to prevent platform unitsfrom becoming overstressed and to prevent their ends from being pulledoff the end supports.<T3>Paragraph 1915.252(e)_Fall protection.</T3> This paragraph would provideprotection against the hazards of falling from or through a scaffold.Paragraph (e)(1) of andSection; 1915.252 clarifies and consolidates the followingexisting rules: andSection;andSection; 1910.28 (a)(3), (b)(15), (c)(14), (d)(7),(f)(15), (g)(5), (h)(8), (i)(5), (j)(4), (m)(7), (n)(8), (r)(3), (u)(6),1910.29(a)(3), and 1915.71 (c)(9), (d)(8), (e)(10), (f)(9), (g)(6), (h)(1),and (j). Whereas the existing rules are specific requirements to have guardrailsonly or safety belts only, the proposal would require that all employeeson scaffolds be protected by a choice of guardrails or body belt/harnesssystems, with certain exceptions discussed below.The proposal would require fall protection as follows: when the scaffoldis any height above water, the same as andSection; 1915.71(j)(1); when thescaffold is on a vessel or vessel section and more than five feet abovelower levels, the same as andSection; 1915.71(j)(1); when the scaffold isimmediately adjacent to a vessel or vessel section and more than five feetabove lower levels, the same as OSHA's current interpretation of andSection;1915.71(j)(1); and when the scaffold is in any other area and more than10 feet above lower levels, the same as andSection; 1910.28(a)(3).Paragraph (e)(1)(i) of andSection; 1915.252 recognizes the impracticabilityof using any fall protection system other than body belt/harness systemson certain types of scaffolds. This consolidates andSection; 1910.28(j)(4)_boatswains'chairs; andSection; 1910.28 (n)(8)_needle beam scaffolds; andSection; 1910.28(u)(6)_floatscaffolds, and is a new rule for ladder jack scaffolds.Paragraph (e)(1)(ii) of andSection; 1915.252 would require both body belt/harnesssystems and guardrail systems on all single-point adjustable suspensionscaffolds (except boatswains' chairs) and on all two-point adjustable suspensionscaffolds. The requirement to have both guardrails and body belt/harnesseson two-point scaffolds is the same as andSection;1910.28 (g)(5) and (g)(9).Guardrail systems alone do not provide adequate fall protection when asuspension rope fails, causing a scaffold to tip or hang from only oneend. Body belt/harness protection would also be required on single-pointsystems as the hazard related to rope failure is the same on both typesof scaffold. However, as body belt/harnesses would be the primary meansof fall protection on single-point and two point systems, Type II guardrailsystems may be used in lieu of Type I systems. Type I and Type II guardrailsystems are the same in all respects except Type II systems have lowerminimum height and strength requirements than Type I systems (see proposedandSection; 1915.252(e)(4) below).Paragraph (e)(1)(iii) of andSection; 1915.252 is essentially the same asandSection; 1910.28(t)(2), which requires lifelines along ``crawling boards,''except that the proposal would allow the alternative use of body belt/harnesssystems or guardrail systems.Paragraph (e)(1)(iv) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that employeeson self-contained scaffolds be protected by body belt/harness and guardrailsystems when the platform is supported by ropes (as when the scaffold isbeing raised or lowered on some systems) and by guardrail systems whenthe platform is supported directly by the scaffold frame.Paragraph (e)(1)(v) of andSection; 1915.252 would require guardrails to beused along scaffold walkways and to be located within eight inches of atleast one side of the walkway. The provision that guardrails need be providedonly along one side applies only when the platform is used as a means ofaccess to get from one point on the scaffold to another. If other workactivities are performed on or from the walkway, then the platform is notconsidered to be a walkway (see definiton of ``walkway'') and the provisionsof paragraphs .252(e)(1) (i) through (v) would apply.Paragraph (e)(1)(vi) of andSection; 1915.252 would allow portions of guardrailsystems to be removed or omitted where the vessel, vessel section, building,or structure is configured in such a way as to preclude their use. However,when guardrails are not used, body belt/harness systems (and personal flotationdevices when employees are over water) would be required. This is the sameprovision as andSection; 1915.71(j)(3).The provisions of andSection; 1915.252(e)(1) would not apply to employeeserecting or dismantling scaffolds. OSHA believes that there is no recognizedfeasible way of providing fall protection for such employees. However,public comment is requested on this point in the Specific Issues sectionof this preamble. In addition, the provisions would not apply if a scaffoldis completely enclosed by the walls of a structure. To be completely enclosed,no perimeter face of the scaffold may be more than 14 inches from a wall.In other words, there may be no open sides or ends on the scaffold. However,fall protection would be required at openings such as hoistways, elevatorshafts, stairwells, or similar openings in the scaffold platform, or inthe walls of the structure surrounding the platform. This is the same requirementas contained in andSection; 1910.28(a)(3)(i).Paragraph (e)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would require guardrail systemsalong the front side (i.e. the side closest to the vessel being workedon) of all scaffolds suspended from vessels when the scaffolds are tricedout of line, and on all scaffolds mounted on floats which are subject tosurging. As an alternative to guardrail systems, employees may be protectedby a body belt/harness system attached to a guardrail system installedon the side of the platform which is away from the vessel. These are thesame requirements as in andSection; 1915.71(j)(4).Paragraph (e)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would provide that body belt/harnessesbe secured by lanyard to a dropline, trolley line, or scaffold structuralmember. However, body belt/harnesses are effective only when there areno overhead scaffold components. When there are such overhead components,such as additional platforms on a multi-level suspended scaffold, or afalling object canopy, and when there is a failure of the scaffold supportsystem, and employee could be seriously injured or killed when the droplinebody belt/harness arrangement arrests the employee's fall, and the overheadcomponent of the scaffold strikes the employee as the scaffold falls tothe ground. Therefore, andSection; 1915.252(e)(3) would provide that whena scaffold has overhead obstructions, then droplines shall not be used.Paragraph (e)(3)(i) would provide that when droplines are used, they notbe connected to the scaffold. This is the same requirement as in andSection;1910.28(g)(9). Paragraph (e)(3)(ii) would provide that when trolley linesare used, they not be connected to the suspension lines. This would provideprotection to the employee in the event of a suspension line failure. Paragraph(e)(3)(iii) would provide that when lanyards area connected to trolleylines or scaffold members on two-point adjustable scaffolds, the scaffoldshall be equipped with additional independent support lines. In the eventof a suspension rope failure, the additional lines would keep the scaffoldfrom falling. Paragraph (e)(3)(iv) would prohibit droplines, independentsupport lines, and suspension ropes from being attached to each other orto the same point of anchorage.Paragraph (e)(4) of andSection; 1915.252 would require guardrail systemsto conform to provisions essentially the same as those discussed in thepreamble to proposed Subpart M_Fall Protection. However, because additionalfall protection on single-point adjustable and two-point adjustable suspensionscaffolds would be provided by body/belt harness systems, the guardrailrequirements on these types of scaffolds are proposed to be less stringentthan on other scaffolds where guardrails are the principal fall protectionsystem. Guardrails on single-point adjustable and two-point adjustablesuspension scaffolds are considered by OSHA primarily to be barriers thatserve as scaffold edge delineators, restrain movement, provide handholds,and prevent misstepping. These functions do not require the same size andstrength guardrail system as does fall protection. Therefore, the minimumrequirements for guardrail systems, (referred to as Type II systems) usedon single-point and two-point scaffolds would be less than those for otherguardrail systems (referred to as Type I systems) used on other scaffolds.The specific differences are set forth in proposed paragraphs (e)(4) (ii),(vii), and (viii), discussed below.Paragraph (e)(4)(i) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that guardrailsystems installed to meet the requirements of this section be installedalong all open sides and ends of the platform. This is the same requirementas andSection; 1910.28(a)(3) and 1915.71(j).Paragraph (e)(4)(ii) of andSection; 1915.252 would specify a minimum guardrailsystem height of 38 inches for Type I guardrail systems and 36 inches forType II guardrail systems. The 38-inch lower limit for Type I systems isproposed in lieu of the existing 36-inch lower limit specified for shoresidescaffolds in andSection; 1910.28(a)(3) because a study concerned with selectedergonomic considerations related to fall protection (Ref. 3:35) indicatesthat the existing 36-inch limit does not provide adequate employee safety.That study recommends a guardrail height of 42 inches, the same as theexisting lower limit for Part 1915 type scaffolds. However, OSHA believesthe proposed limit of 38 inches is appropriate for scaffolds, because itallows for guardrail height differentials caused by platform unit arrangements.For example, a frame constructed to hold a toprail 42 inches above a flush-mountedprefabricated deck would be only 40 inches above a platform made with two-inchsolid sawn planks. Where the planks are overlapped to form a long platform,the toprail height drops to 38 inches. (It should be noted that the 36inch limit proposed for Type II guardrails is acceptable because Type IIsystems are not used as the primary means of fall protection.) The maximumheight limit would be 45 inches for all scaffold guardrail systems. Theselimits are consistent with limits being developed for the constructionand general industry standards. However, public comment is requested onthese points in the Specific Issues section of this preamble.Paragraph (e)(4)(iii) of andSection; 1915.252 would require midrails, screens,mesh, intermediate vertical members (such as balusters), solid panels,or equivalent structural members be installed between the top edge of theguardrail system and the scaffold platform. This is essentially the sameprovision as andSection; 1910.28(a)(3), except it has been rewritten to clarifythe requirement, and to allow additional types of protection as alternativesto midrails.Paragraphs (e)(4) (iv) through (vi) of andSection; 1915.252 specify the criteriafor the installation of the midrails, screen, mesh, and baluster type protectionrequired by paragraph (e)(4)(iii) of andSection; 1915.252.Paragraphs (e)(4) (vii) and (viii) of andSection; 1915.252 would specifythat Type I toprails (or equivalent) be capable of withstanding a forceof at least 200 pounds applied in any downward or horizontal directionat any point along the toprail (Type II guardrail systems would have a100 pound minimum requirement) and not deflect to a height lower than thespecified limit set forth in paragraph (e)(4)(ii). The force requirementfor midrails, screens, mesh, and other intermediate types of protectionin paragraph (e)(4)(ix) would be at least 150 pounds for Type I systems,and 75 pounds for Type II systems. The 150 pound force requirement replacesthe andSection; 1910.28(a)(3)(ii) and the andSection; 1915.71(j)(2) requirementsto use specified sizes of lumber.Paragraph (e)(4)(x) of andSection; 1915.252 would recognize that a separateguardrail section is not required on the ends of suspension scaffolds whenthe scaffold's support system (stirrup) or hoist does not allow passageof employees.Paragraph (e)(4)(xi) of andSection; 1915.252 would require toprail and midrailsurfaces to be free of puncture, laceration, and snagging hazards. Thisis essentially the same requirement as in andSection; 1910.23(e)(1).Paragraph (e)(4)(xii) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that toprailsand midrails not be so long as to constitute a hazard, and is the samerequirement as andSection; 1910.23(e)(1).Paragraph (e)(4)(xiii) of andSection; 1915.252 would be a new requirementand would prohibit the use of steel banding and plastic banding as toprailsor midrails. While such banding can often withstand a 200 pound load, itcan tear easily if twisted. In addition, such banding often has sharp edgeswhich can cut a hand if seized.<T3>Paragraph 1915.252(f)_Falling object protection</T3>. This paragraphwould address the hazard of objects falling onto employees working on scaffolds.Protection against objects falling from scaffolds is provided by proposedSubpart M_Fall Protection.Paragraph (f)(1) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that, in additionto hardhat protection, overhead protection be provided as necessary foremployees on scaffolds when they are exposed to the hazard of objects fallingfrom overhead. This paragraph is based on existing rules andSection;andSection;1910.28 (a)(16) and (f)(16), and is consistent with andSection; 1915.71(j)(5).Paragraph (f)(2) of andSection; 1915.252 would require canopies, when usedas falling object protection, to be installed between the hazard and theemployees. This is the same provision as andSection; 1915.28(f)(16) exceptthe specific nine foot height limit is deleted as unnecessarily specific.Paragraph (f)(3) of andSection; 1915.252 would require the use of additionalindependent support lines when canopies are used on suspension scaffolds.The lines would support the scaffold in the event of suspension supportrope failure. The reason for this requirement has been explained earlierin the discussion of andSection; 1915.252(e)(4).Paragraph (f)(4) of andSection; 1915.252 would require that independent supportlines and suspension ropes not be attached to the same point of anchorage.This new rule would prevent the loss of the backup safety systems in theevent of suspension rope anchorage failure.Paragraphs (f)(4) and (5) of andSection; 1915.252 would require toeboardson scaffolds to protect employees who are below the scaffold from fallingobjects. These paragraphs are based on existing rules andSection; 1915.71(j)(5)and andSection; 1910.28(a)(3) respectively.Section 1915.253 Additional requirements applicable to specific types ofscaffoldsThis section contains rules which would apply only to specific types ofscaffolds as indicated. These rules would apply in addition to the generalrules of andSection; 1915.252. In keeping with 5 CFR Part 1320, ControllingPaperwork Burdens on the Public, the existing Part 1910 provisions requiringscaffold drawings and specifications to be made available to the employerand for inspection purposes, are proposed to be deleted as to their applicationin shipyards. These provisions are contained in andSection; 1910.28(b)(16),(c)(4), (c)(5), (d)(11), and (e)(3). However, the employer may want tomaintain the records anyway to serve as a reference point for future evaluationof a scaffold's design and its load limits. Such records would be valuablein determining whether or not a scaffold is overloaded.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(a)_Pole scaffolds</T3>. This paragraph combinesthe ``wood pole scaffolds'' of andSection; 1910.28(b) and the ``independentpole wood scaffolds'' of andSection; 1915.71(c). The word ``wood'' wouldbe deleted from the title as used in the existing supparts, as such scaffoldscan be made of other materials. The paragraph addresses both independentpole (double pole) scaffolds and single pole scaffolds.The following table lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantivelychanged from the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphslisted:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(1)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(14), andSection; 1915.71(c)(4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(2)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(9), andSection; 1915.71(c)(6).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(3)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(10), andSection; 1915.71(c)(6).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(4)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(10), andSection; 1915.71(c)(6).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(5)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(5), andSection; 1915.71(c)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(6)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(5), andSection; 1915.71(c)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(7)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(7), andSection; 1915.71(c)(4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(8)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(7), (10).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(9)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(2), andSection; 1915.71(c)(2), (3).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(a)(10)<D>andSection; 1910.28(b)(16).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (a)(11) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that wood pole scaffoldsnot be erected beyond the reach of firefighting equipment. This is thesame provision as andSection; 1910.28(b)(17) except the word ``effective''would be deleted from the paragraph to clarify the requirement.The remaining pole scaffold provisions of Subparts D and E would not becarried forward in this paragraph as specific provisions for pole scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(b)_Tube and coupler scaffolds. </T3>This paragraphcombines the ``tube and coupler scaffolds'' of andSection; 1910.28(c) andthe ``independent pole metal scaffolds'' of andSection; 1915.71(d). The followingtable lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphs listed:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(2)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(11), andSection; 1915.71(d)(6).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(3)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(12), andSection; 1915.71(d)(6).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(4)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(12).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(5)<D>andSection; 1915.71(d)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(6)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(9).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(8)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(8).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(9)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c)(8).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(b)(11)<D>andSection; 1910.28(c) (14), (5).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (b)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 is new for tube and coupler scaffoldsand would require that platforms not be moved until the next location isproperly prepared to support the platform being moved. This is the samerequirement as andSection; 1910.28(b)(14) for wood pole scaffolds. This ruleis added to this section because it addresses the problem of platform stabilityduring construction, a problem which exists for tube and coupler scaffoldsas well as pole scaffolds.Paragraph (b)(7) of andSection; 1915.253 would require bearers to be longenough to provide full contact with the coupler. This is essentially thesame as andSection; 1910.28(c)(10), however, the specifications are deletedbecause component strength would be governed by proposed general rule andSection;1915.252(a)(1).Paragraph (b)(10) of andSection; 1915.253 would specify the types of materialsfrom which couplers may be made. This substantive requirement is currentlycontained in existing definition andSection; 1910.21(f)(6), ``coupler,''and is more appropriately incorporated into a substantive section of theproposed standard.The remaining tube and coupler scaffold provisions of Subparts D and Ewould not be carried forward in this paragraph as specific provisions fortube and coupler scaffolds because the topics they address would be coveredby the proposed general rules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(c)_Fabricated frame scaffolds. </T3>As discussedin the ``definitions'' section of this preamble, this type of scaffoldis presently called a ``tubular welded frame scaffold.'' The proposed namemore appropriately describes the type of scaffold to be addressed.The following table lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantivelychanged from the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphslisted.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(c)(2)<D>andSection; 1910.28(d)(3).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(c)(3)<D>andSection; 1910.28(d)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(c)(6)<D>andSection; 1910.28(d)(11).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 is new for fabricated frame scaffoldsand would require that platforms not be moved until the next location isproperly prepared to support the platform being moved. This would be donefor the same reasons discussed for paragraph (b)(1) of andSection; 1915.253.Paragraph (c)(4) of andSection; 1915.253 would require the locking togetherof end frames and is essentially the same as andSection; 1910.28(d)(6). Therequirement would only apply where uplift forces may be strong enough todisplace the end frames or panels, such as when a hoist is being used thatcould snag the scaffold during a hoist operation.Paragraph (c)(5) of andSection; 1915.253 would specify the proper placementof platform support brackets. Improper placement of such cantilever supportscan significantly reduce their support capacity and thus endanger employeesworking on the platform.The remaining existing tubular welded frame scaffold provisions would notbe carried forward in this paragraph as specific provisions for fabricatedframe scaffolds because the topics they address would be covered by theproposed general rules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(d)_Horse scaffolds. </T3>This paragraph combinesthe ``horse scaffolds'' of andSection;andSection; 1910.28(m) and 1915.71(g).The following table lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantivelychanged from the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphslisted.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(d)(1)<D>andSection; 1910.28(m)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(d)(2)<D>andSection; 1910.28(m)(4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(d)(3)<D>andSection; 1910.28(m)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(d)(4)<D>andSection; 1910.28(m)(5).</D></ITAG></ITAG>The remaining existing horse scaffold provisions would not be carried forwardin this paragraph as specific provisions for horse scaffolds because thetopics they address would be covered by the proposed general rules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(e)_Bracket scaffolds. </T3>Bracket scaffolds arepresently addressed by andSection; 1910.28(k)_Carpenters' bracket scaffolds.The title is proposed to be changed to ``Bracket scaffolds'' to reflectthe use of this scaffold by a variety of trades.Paragraph (e)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would specify the types of attachmentdevices or systems used for supporting bracket type scaffolds. These arethe same as presently required by andSection; 1910.28(k)(2).Paragraph (e)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would require folding-type metalbrackets to be secured against folding when extended for use. This wouldbe a new provision and is based on paragraph andSection; 1926.451(x)(5)(i),which applies to similar scaffolds used in the construction industry.The remaining existing bracket scaffold provisions would not be carriedforward in this paragraph as specific provisions for bracket scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(f)_Outrigger scaffolds. </T3>The following tablelists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphs listed.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(1) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(2) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(3) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(4) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(5) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(2).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(6) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(2).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(7) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(f)(8) <D>andSection; 1910.28(e)(3).</D></ITAG></ITAG>The remaining existing outrigger scaffold provisions would not be carriedforward in this paragraph as specific provisions for outrigger scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(g)_Ladder jack scaffolds. </T3>The following tablelists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphs listed:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(g)(1) <D>andSection; 1910.28(g)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(g)(3) <D>andSection; 1910.28(g)(3).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(g)(4) <D>andSection; 1910.28(g)(4).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (g)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that all ladders usedto support ladder jack scaffolds conform to the provisions of andSection;1915.86 of proposed Subpart E_Access and Egress. However, the paragraphwould prohibit the use of job-made ladders to support lader jacks becauseOSHA believes such ladders cannot be relied upon to have the capacity tosupport the heavy point loading caused by ladder jack brackets. Paragraph (g)(5) of andSection; 1915.253 would prohibit the bridging of oneladder jack scaffold to another. This would be a new requirement and wouldbe made to assure the stability of the system and to prevent accidentaloverloading of the system. This provision would not prohibit passage fromone scaffold to another.The remaining existing ladder jack scaffold provisions would not be carriedforward in this paragraph as specific provisions for ladder jack scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(h)_Window jack scaffolds. </T3>The following tablelists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraph listed:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(h)(2) <D>andSection; 1910.28(r)(1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(h)(3) <D>andSection; 1910.28(r)(2).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (h)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would require window jack scaffoldsto be securely attached to the window opening. This new requirement wouldassure that the scaffold cannot be accidentally displaced.The remaining existing window jack scaffold provisions would not be carriedforward in this paragraph as specific provisions for window jack scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(i)_Crawling boards (chicken ladders). </T3>Paragraph(i)(1) of andSection;1915.253 would be the same requirement as is presentlycontained in the fourth sentence of andSection;1910.28(t)(1), which specifiescrawling board length. The remaining specific requirements of andSection;1910.28(t)(1)would be relocated to Appendix A as they would be effectively replacedby the general scaffold capacity requirements of andSection;1915.252(a)(1).The requirement to clinch nails would be deleted as this procedure is oftennot feasible due to the inaccessibility of the nail points. Existing paragraphandSection;1910.28(t)(2) would be replaced by the fall protection requirementsof andSection;1915.252(e)(1). <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(j)_Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffolds.</T3>These types of scaffolds differ from ladder jack scaffold in thatthe platform rests directly on the ladder step or rung, whereas ladderjack scaffolds platforms rest on brackets. The proposed specific requirementsin this paragraph are based on similar provisions being developed by theAmerican National Standards Institute, and on similar provisions beingdeveloped by OSHA for the construction industry and for general industryapplication. The specification provisions currently in andSection;1915.71(e)would be replaced by the capacity requirements of proposed general ruleandSection;1915.252(a)(1) and by the ladder provisions of proposed SubpartE_Access and Egress.Paragraph (j)(1) of andSection;1915.253 would limit the height of the scaffoldplatforms to the second highest rungs or steps of ladders supporting theplatform, and would provide increased scaffold stability by lowering thecenter of gravity. Paragraphs (j) (2), and (3), and (4) of andSection;1915.253are the same provisions as paragraphs (i) (2), (4), and (5) of andSection;1915.253proposed for ladder jack scaffolds. Paragraph (j)(5) of andSection;1915.253is the same requirement as current andSection;1915.71(e)(7).  <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(k)_Single-point adjustable suspension scaffolds.</T3>This paragraph would combine existing andSection;1910.28(i), single-pointadjustable suspension scaffolds, and andSection;1910.28(j), boatswains' chairs,as boatswains' chairs are a form of single-point adjustable suspensionscaffold.The following table lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantivelychanged from the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphslisted: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(k)(1) <D>andSection;1910.28(i)(7).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(k)(3) <D>andSection;1910.28(j)(5).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(k)(5) <D>andSection;1910.28(j)(2).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(k)(6) <D>andSection;1910.28(j)(3).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (k)(2) of andSection;1915.253 would be essentially the same asandSection;1910.28(i)(8), and would require that all suspension ropes hangvertically. However, the proposal would provide an exception to this rule,allowing intermediate supports to change the rope direction from vertical,when the scaffold is to be used on the outside of a dome-type or slantedstructure. OSHA is soliciting comments on this proposed rule in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble. Paragraph (k)(4) of andSection;1915.253 would be essentially the same asandSection;1910.28(j)(2), and would require boatswains' chairs to be riggedwith crossed supporting slings. However, the proposal would add that theslings be rigged (usually with knots) to prevent slippage which could resultin the platform being out-of-level. This would increase the stability ofthe seat.Paragraph (k)(7) of andSection;1915.253 would require non-cross laminatedwood chairs to be reinforced on their underside by cleats. Existing ruleandSection;1910.28(j)(1) requires all chairs to be cleated. This proposedrule recognizes the inherent strength qualities of cross-laminated-typewood seats such as those made with plywood.The remaining existing single-point provisions would not be carried forwardin this paragraph as specific provisions for single-point adjustable suspensionscaffolds as the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(l)_Two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds. </T3>Thisparagraph combines the ``two-point suspension scaffolds'' of andSection;1910.28(g)and the ``painters' suspended scaffolds'' of andSection;1915.71(f). The followingtable lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphs listed:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(l)(2) <D>andSection;1910.28(g)(1), andSection;1915.71(f)(4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(l)(3) <D>andSection;1910.28(g)(7).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.253(l)(5) <D>andSection;1910.28(g)(11).</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (l)(1) of andSection;1915.253 would be essentially the same asparagraph andSection;1910.28(g)(1), which limits the width of platforms to36 inches. However, the proposal would allow wider platforms if they aredesigned by a qualified person to prevent unstable conditions.Paragraph (l)(4) of andSection;1915.253 would require that scaffolds be ladder-type,plank-type, or beam-type, the same as currently required by andSection;1910.28(g)(12).However, the specifications contained in existing paragraph andSection;1910.28(g)(12)(i) through (iii) would be replaced by the capacity requirements of andSection;1915.252(a)(1).Paragraph (l)(6) of andSection;1915.253 would prohibit the bridging or connectingof two or more scaffolds during raising and lowering operations, unlessthey meet three criteria: first, the scaffolds must be specifically designedfor use on multipoint systems; second, they must be articulated; and third,the hoists must be properly sized to support a bridged scaffold installation.This rule is based on andSection;1915.71(f)(7) and reflects OSHA's concernthat a bridging device could cause significant overloading of the hoistwhich is nearest the bridging device during operation of the hoist, andcould cause excessive platform tipping. Many hoists are only sized to supportone end of a two-point system. If one of two bridged scaffolds were tobe raised by a hoist, a bridge or connection between the scaffolds couldcause the rising scaffold to pick up the second scaffold also. This wouldsignificantly increase the load on the hoist and could also result in thesecond scaffold tipping up at a dangerous angle. The proposed rule wouldaddress these two hazards by prohibiting an unsafe practice, but wouldalso allow for properly engineered solutions as alternative means of compliance.This provision would not prohibit passage from one scaffold to another.Paragraph (l)(7) of andSection;1915.253 would allow the passage of employeesfrom one scaffold to another, provided the scaffolds are at the same height;are abutting closely; and walk-through stirrups are used. The remaining existing two-point suspension and painters' suspended scaffoldprovisions would not be carried forward in this paragraph as specific provisionsfor two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds because the topics they addresswould be covered by the proposed general rules. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(m)_Multi-point adjustable suspension scaffolds.</T3>This section would combine and clarify the provisions of andSection; 1910.28(h),stonesetters' adjustable multi-point suspension scaffolds, and andSection;1910.28(f), masons' adjustable multi-point suspension scaffolds, and wouldclarify that the paragraph applies to other multi-point adjustable suspensionscaffolds as well. Paragraph (m)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would prohibit bridging betweenscaffolds unless they are specifically designed to be bridged. Paragraph(m)(2) would allow passage of employees between adjacent units only whenthe platforms are at the same height and abutting closely. The reasonsfor these paragraphs are the same as those for paragraphs (1) (6) and (7)of andSection; 1915.253 above. Paragraph (m)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 would specify the criteria for thesupport system, and is the same as andSection; 1910.28(h)(4). The remaining existing stonesetters' and masons' adjustable multiple-pointsuspension scaffold provisions would not be carried forward in this paragraphas specific provisions for multi-point adjustable suspension scaffoldsbecause the topics they address would be covered by the proposed generalrules. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(n)_Catenary scaffolds.</T3> Although this type ofscaffold is not specifically addressed in either existing standard, catenaryscaffolds are covered by the existing general provisions of andSection;andSection;1910.28(a) and 1915.71(h). The following are new provisions that addressconcerns not presently covered by either the existing general rules orthe proposed general provisions. These new provisions would be essentiallythe same as existing ANSI A10.8-1977, paragraph 22, except the specificationscontained in that standard would be replaced by the general capacity provisionsin proposed paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 1915.252. Paragraph (n)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would allow only one platform betweenvertical pickups and only two platforms would be allowed on the entiresystem. This is the same provision as ANSI A10.8-1977, paragraph 22.4 exceptthe maximum load limit of 500 pounds is deleted as being too restrictive.The intent of this provision is to prevent catenary scaffolds from beingoverloaded by prohibiting the employer from placing too many platformson the system at one time and the general capacity provision andSection;1915.252(a)(1) would apply. However, public comment is requested in theSpecific Issues section of this preamble as to what other load criteria,if any, are necessary to address these concerns. Paragraph (n)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would require the platforms to beequipped with hook-shaped stops on each end to prevent the platform fromfalling should one of the two horizontal support ropes break. Paragraph (n)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 would prohibit the horizontal supportropes from being made so taut that use of the platform could cause themto break. Paragraph (n)(4) of andSection; 1915.253 would require each horizontal wirerope support to be continuous and unspliced. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(o)_Float (ship) scaffolds.</T3> Paragraph (o)(1)of andSection; 1915.253 would require the scaffold to consist of at leasttwo bearers with six inch projections, securely connected to the platform.Paragraph (o)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would require rope connections tobe such that they will not slip nor cause the platform to tip or fall.Paragraph (o)(3) of andSection;1915.253 would provide that if two ropes areused, they shall be slung under the scaffold and up to the supports. Theserequirements are essentially the same as are required by andSection;andSection;1910.28(u) (3) and (5). The remaining existing float scaffold provisions would not be carried forwardin this paragraph as specific provisions for float scaffolds because thetopics they address would be covered by the proposed general rules. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(p)_Interior hung scaffolds.</T3> Paragraph (p)(1)of andSection; 1915.253 would require that scaffolds be suspended only fromthe roof structure or other structural members such as a ship's overhead,or a building's ceiling beams. This is the same requirement as existingrule andSection; 1910.28(p)(1). Paragraph (p)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that the supportingmembers be inspected and checked for strength before the scaffold is erected.Such points of support cannot be assumed to be strong enough to supporta scaffold as they may be already loaded to their capacity or they mayhave deteriorated over time. This is the same requirement as andSection;1910.28(p)(6). Paragraph (p)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 would delete the specific connectionrequirements of andSection; 1910.28(p)(5), which OSHA believes are overlyspecific, and sets forth what OSHA considers to be current safe connectionpractices. The remaining existing interior hung scaffold provisions would not be carriedforward in this paragraph as specific provisions for interior hung scaffoldsas the topics they address would be covered by the proposed general rules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(q)_Needle beam scaffolds.</T3> The following tablelists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantively changedfrom the corresponding requirement in the existing paragraphs listed: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,xs80</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph </H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(q)(1) <D>andSection; 1910.28(n)(1). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(q)(2) <D>andSection; 1910.28(n) (2) and (7).</D></ITAG></ITAG> Paragraph (q)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that support ropesbe securely attached to the needle beams. This is a change from andSection;1910.28(n)(3), which requires all attachments to be either a scaffold hitchknot or eye splice. The existing rule is believed by OSHA to be too restrictive,as other knots and means of attachment, such as wire rope clips, can alsoadequately support the scaffold. Paragraph (q)(4) of andSection; 1915.253 would require support connectionsto be arranged such that the needle beams do not roll or otherwise becomedisplaced. This provision is based on andSection;1926.451(4), a constructionindustry provision which OSHA believes should apply to all needle beamscaffolds. Paragraph (q)(5) of andSection; 1915.253 would require platform units tobe bolted to the needle beam, or equivalent means of attachment used suchas nails, to prevent the displacement of the units. This is a clarificationof andSection; 1910.28(n)(5) which only requires that planks be secured againstslipping. Under the existing rule, cleats and overhang could be used tosecure the units. However, OSHA does not believe that cleats or overhangare adequate measures to secure platform units on needle beam scaffolds.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(r)_Multi-level suspended scaffolds.</T3> These scaffoldsare suspended scaffolds with more than one working level. Although thesetypes of scaffolds are not specifically addressed in the existing standards,they are covered by the existing general requirements. The following provisionsaddress concerns not presently covered by either the existing standardor the proposed general provisions. Paragraph (r)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would require independent supportlines in addition to the regular support ropes. These additional lineswould support the scaffold and prevent collapse in the event of primarysupport line failure. The reasons for requiring these lines are given inthe discussion for andSection; 1915.252(e) which covers fall protection.Because the primary support lines could fail anywhere between the scaffoldand their point of anchorage (the anchorage itself could fail), paragraph(r)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would prohibit attaching independent supportlines and suspension ropes to the same anchorage point. Paragraph (r)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 would prohibit platforms from beingsupported by any other platform(s). This provision would protect againstplatform overloading by requiring each platform to be attached to the supportingstirrups or hangers. <T3>Paragraph 1915.253(s)_Mobile scaffolds.</T3> This section would consolidateand clarify the provisions of andSection; 1910.29 of the general industrystandards. This paragraph would apply to all mobile scaffolds and not justto those which are manually propelled. The following table lists the proposed paragraphs which would not be substantivelychanged from the corresponding requirements in the existing paragraphslisted: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,xs72,r10</C>  <H1>Proposed paragraph </H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(s)(1) <D>andSection; 1910.29 (a)(3)(iii), (b)(2), (e)(3). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.253(s)(2) <D>andSection; 1910.29(a)(4).</D></ITAG></ITAG> Paragraph (s)(3) of andSection; 1915.253 is a new provision and is basedon the construction industry provision andSection; 1926.451(e)(6), whichrequires that propelling forces be applied as close to the base as possiblefor stability reasons. However, the proposal would limit the height atwhich the force could be applied to five feet to minimize the overturningforces generated when the propelling force is applied above the wheels.The five foot limit is high enough to allow the manual propelling of scaffolds.Paragraph (s)(4) of andSection; 1915.253 is a new provision and would eliminatethe use of winches, forklifts, trucks, or other motor vehicles to movescaffolds which are not designed to be moved by such propulsion systems.Paragraph (s)(5) of andSection; 1915.253 is a new provision and would requirescaffolds to be stabilized during movement. This provision is based onthe construction industry provision, andSection; 1926.451(e)(6). Paragraphs (s)(6)(i)_(iii) of andSection; 1915.253 are new provisions andare based on the construction industry provision andSection; 1926.451(e)(7)which specifies minimum conditions for when employees may ride on movingscaffolds. Paragraph (s)(6)(iv) of andSection; 1915.253 is a new provision and wouldrequire the propelling force be applied directly to the wheels (not tothe frame) when power systems are used to propel scaffolds, and would limitthe speed of the scaffold to one and one-fourth miles per hour. This provisionis intended to protect against a scaffold toppling over should it strikean object. Paragraph (s)(6)(v) of andSection; 1915.253 is a new provision and wouldprohibit employees from riding on any part of a moving scaffold which extendsoutward beyond the wheels, casters, or other support.Paragraph (s)(7) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that scaffold platformsnot to extend outward past the base supports of the scaffold. This provisionwould eliminate dangerous eccentric loading on the scaffold frame whichcould cause the scaffold to tip over. However, if stabilizing means suchas outrigger supports are used, then the platform may extend outside thenormal base points of support.Paragraph (s)(8) of andSection; 1915.253 would require that screw jacks orequivalent means be used to level mobile scaffolds when they are set upfor stationary use. This provision is based on andSection; 1910.29(a)(4)(iii).Paragraph (s)(9) of andSection; 1915.253 would be a new paragraph and wouldrequire caster and wheel stems to be secured to scaffold frames to preventthem from falling out at any time. The remaining existing manually propelled mobile ladder stands and scaffolds(towers) provisions would not be carried forward in this paragraph as specificprovisions for mobile scaffolds because the topics they address would becovered by the proposed general rules.<T3>Paragraph 1915.253(t)_Crane or derrick suspended personnel platforms</T3>.Paragraph (t)(1) of andSection; 1915.253 would require lifting bridles toconsist of four legs attached to the platform to assure stability. Thisis the same provision as andSection; 1915.71(b)(9).Paragraph (t)(2) of andSection; 1915.253 would specify the means of attachingthe platform lifting bridles to the crane or derrick, and is the same provisionas andSection; 1915.71(b)(10).OSHA is currently developing rules to cover personnel platforms used inthe construction industry. Public comment is requested in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble as to whether or not similar rules shouldbe developed for shipyard employment.Appendix A to Subpart N_Scaffold SpecificationsAs explained in the discussion for proposed andSection; 1915.252(a), Capacity,Appendix A is a non-mandatory set of guidelines and tables provided toassist employers in complying with the requirements of andSection; 1915.252(a).The provisions are essentially the same as found throughout the existingstandards. An employer may use these guidelines and tables as a startingpoint for designing scaffold systems. However, the guidelines and tablesdo not provide all the information necessary to build a complete system.For example, the tables for wood pole scaffolds do not specify the manneror type of joint construction. For all such components the employer isresponsible for designing and assembling those components in such a waythat the completed system will meet the requirements of andSection; 1915.252(a).In addition, if the employer chooses to deviate from any provisions orguidelines in Appendix A, the scaffold must still comply with paragraph1915.252(a).Specific IssuesThe public is specifically requested to comment on the following issues.1. Proposed rule andSection; 1915.252(e) specifies fall protection requirementsfor scaffolds. Those used on or near vessels must have fall protectionwhenever the fall distance is five feet or more, the same as andSection;1915.71(j)(1). Scaffolds used away from vessels must have fall protectionwhenever the fall distance is 10 feet or more, the same as andSection; 1910.28(a)(3).A recent Bureau of Labor Statistics' study indicates that of all injurieswhich result from falls, a high percentage involves falling from elevationsbetween five and 10 feet (Ref. 4:9). In addition, a high percentage offalls occurred while the employees were on scaffolds (Ref. 4:9). Publiccomment is requested on whether or not OSHA should extend the five footrule to all scaffolds located and used in any part of a shipyard. Commentsshould include appropriate cost and injury data.2. Is there a need for OSHA to regulate the use of electric welding equipmenton suspended scaffolds? Should OSHA adopt any or all of the following draftrules which are presently being developed and evaluated by the ANSI A10.8Scaffold Committee?To reduce the possibility of the welding current arcing through the wirerope when welding from suspended scaffolds, the following precautions shallbe taken:(a) Use a suitable insulated thimble to attach each wire rope to its hangingsupport (such as a cornice hook or outrigger). Insulate extra rope fromgrounding.(b) Cover the suspension wire rope with insulating material approximatelyfour to five feet above the hoist, and below the hoist extending downwardsufficiently to insulate the tail line from the unit. The portion of thetail line that hangs free below the unit must be guided and/or retainedsuch that it does not become grounded.Place non-conducting insulating material under wire rope so that it doesnot come in contact with ground.(c) Cover each hoist with protective covers made from insulating material.(d) Connect a grounding conductor from the unit to the structure. The sizeof this conductor must be equal to or greater than the size of the weldingmachine grounding lead and shall be a secondary conductor and must notbe in series with the primary conductor between the welder and the workpiece.(e) If unit grounding lead is disconnected at any time, welding machineshall be turned off.(f) At no time shall active welding rod or uninsulated welding lead beallowed to contact the stage or its supporting system. 3. Should the final rule prohibit the use of forklifts, front-end loaders,and similar pieces of equipment for the support of scaffold platforms?If so, what specific pieces of equipment should be prohibited and whatother related requirements, if any, are necessary? Comments should includeappropriate injury and cost data. 4. Proposed rule andSection;1915.253(s)(6)(ii) requires manually-propelledand motor-propelled mobile scaffolds to be not more than twice as highas they are wide when employees ride on them. Should OSHA raise the proposed2 to 1 ratio to 3 to 1 or higher on those systems which are built witha low center-of-gravity? If this change is made, what limitations are appropriate?5. Should OSHA require all platform units (planks, decks, etc.) to havetheir capacities or grades marked on them? Arguments in favor of this arethat such marks could help prevent the use of inferior grades of plankin platforms, and that they would aid the user in determining the maximumload which can be placed safely on the plank or other unit. Arguments againstthis are that such marks can wear off, or that units can deteriorate makingthe marks no longer valid. Also, although such marks can be very usefulin the construction of a safe scaffold, their presence or absence do not,in themselves, make a plank safe or unsafe. 6. Proposed rule andSection;1915.252(d)(11) would prohibit work on scaffoldsduring storms or when wind speeds exceed 40 mph, unless body belts areworn or wind screens erected. Comment is requested on the 40 mph limit,and on how to measure the windspeed. Recommendations on windspeed measurementrange from monitoring hourly radio weather reports to placing anemometerson every scaffold. OSHA also solicits comments on other methods that mightbe used to provide employee safety in high winds. 7. Existing rule andSection;1910.28(g)(11) and proposed rule andSection;1915.253(1)(5)require two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds to be secured to preventswaying. Should OSHA extend this rule to cover all suspended scaffolds?8. Should proposed rule andSection;1915.252(e)(1), which provides that fallprotection is not required for employees performing scaffold erection anddismantling operations, apply only to supported scaffolds? Such scaffoldsdo not have a recognized feasible place to which body belt/harness systemscan be attached. However, suspended scaffolds are often located such thatdroplines can be conveniently used and, therefore, employees could be tiedoff. 9. Existing rule andSection;1910.28(i)(8) requires the supporting rope forsingle-point adjustable suspension scaffolds to be vertical. The proposedrule andSection;1915.253(k)(2) would allow an exception when the scaffoldis used on the outside of a dome-type or slanted structure. Should somespecified deviation from vertical be allowed when suspending a scaffoldunder a curved surface? If yes, what should be the maximum angle permitted,and what other conditions, if any, should be specified? 10. For the reasons discussed in the Summary and Explanation section ofthis preamble, the proposed rule andSection;1915.252(e)(4) would set therange of acceptable guardrail height at 38 inches to 45 inches for supportedscaffolds, and would allow 36-inch high guardrails only for certain typesof suspended scaffolds. The ANSI A10.8 subcommittee on scaffolds considers the 36-inch lower limitto address adequately the hazard of falling from all types of scaffolds.This position is strongly supported by the Scaffold Industry Association(SIA). Their conclusions are based on the argument that OSHA's existingand proposed rules are based on studies (Ref. 5 and 6) which evaluatedproper guardrail height for permanent structures, large areas where crowdcontrol is important, and areas where high body speeds and momentum commonlyare generated. These conditions, it is argued, do not exist on scaffoldsand, therefore, the OSHA regulations are too restrictive and not appropriatefor scaffold work. The SIA's conclusion is that a lower limit of 36 incheson scaffolds is as effective as a lower limit of 39 inches for permanentand large area structures. In addition, industry representatives statethat no accident statistics, nor other field studies, indicate any problemcaused by the current industry practice of using 36-inch high guardrails.Comment is requested on the effectiveness and cost savings of a 36-inchlower limit for guardrail height. 11. Should OSHA accept crossbracing on the intermediate levels of built-upscaffolds as an alternative to the existing and proposed rules requiringguardrail systems on such levels? Are crossbraces as effective in providingfall protection as conventional guardrail systems? The existing and proposedOSHA rules do not recognize crossbracing as an effective guardrail-typesystem for preventing falls. However, industry representatives supportthe contention that, within limits, crossbracing can effectively performas a guardrail-type system. Their position is that depending on the heightof the cross point of the braces, crossbracing can effectively serve asa toprail, midrail, or in some situations, as both toprail and midrail.This position is supported to a degree by a study conducted by the Universityof Michigan (Ref. 6:37). However, an earlier study, also conducted by theUniversity of Michigan (Ref. 7:143), does not support this concept. The industry position that crossbracing can be as effective as guardrailsis based on views similar to those discussed in Issue Number 10 above.Industry argues that the studies on which the requirements for guardrailsystems are based do not properly reflect actual field conditions or accidentstatistics. For example, the Michigan study (Ref. 7:136) states there shouldbe no opening in a guardrail or crossbrace system that would allow passageof a 19-inch sphere (19 inches is slightly less than the shoulder widthof the 95th percentile U.S. adult male population). The industry positionis that it is not a fair representation to equate a human body with a 19-inchsphere.   The specific provisions suggested by industry representatives for adoptionby OSHA are as follows: (a) Crossbracing on supported scaffolds may be used in lieu of a midrailprovided the crossing point of the two braces is at or between 31 inchesand 20 inches above the work surface. (b) Crossbracing on supported scaffolds may be used in lieu of midrailsand toprails provided the cross point of the two braces is at or between48 inches and 30 inches above the work surface, and the end points at eachupright are not more than 54 inches apart. (c) Crossbracing may not be used in lieu of either a toprail or midrailon the top level of any supported scaffold. The following have also been suggested as appropriate provisions: (a) Crossbracing on supported scaffolds may be used in lieu of a toprailprovided the crossing point of the two braces is at or between 39 inchesand 49 inches above the work surface, and the end points at each uprightare not more than 54 inches apart. (b) Crossbracing on supported scaffolds may be used in lieu of midrailsprovided the crossing point of the two braces is at or between 30 inchesand 20 inches above the work surface. (c) Crossbracing may not be used in lieu of either a toprail or midrailon the top level of any supported scaffold. (d) Crossbracing on supported scaffolds may not be used in lieu of botha toprail and midrail on the same scaffold level at the same time. Comments and data reflecting engineering analysis and actual experiencein the use of crossbracing are requested on the effectiveness of crossbracingwhen used in lieu of toprails, midrails, or both. 12. Should OSHA permit mobile scaffolds to be moved only along their longitudinalaxis while employees are riding on them? This provision would be intendedto maximize scaffold stability during movement, as tipping is most likelyto occur when scaffolds are moved along their transverse axis. 13. Proposed rule andSection;1915.252(d)(3) would require supported scaffoldsand scaffold components to be inspected for visible defects prior to eachworkshift and after any occurrence which could affect a scaffold's structuralintegrity. In addition, suspension scaffolds and scaffold components wouldneed to be inspected for visible defects immediately after installationprior to their first use; periodically thereafter (preferably before eachuse); and after any occurrence which could affect a scaffold's structuralintegrity. Public comment is requested on whether or not the stated frequenciesof inspection are appropriate or if some lesser or greater periods shouldbe required. In addition, comment is requested on whether the inspectorshould be an engineer, a qualified person, or a capable person. 14. Should OSHA specify a minimum slippage capacity of 4,000 pounds anda minimum breakage capacity of 16,000 pounds for couplers used on tubeand coupler type scaffolds? Industry proponents argue that such a ruleis necessary to assure proper scaffold strength. 15. The proposed requirements do not limit the height at which single-pointadjustable suspension scaffolds and two-point adjustable suspension scaffoldsmay be used. Should OSHA set such a limit, and if so, what should thisheight be, and why? 16. Currently, OSHA does not regulate the use of stilts. Public commentis requested on whether or not such rules are necessary. Proponents forsuch rules should include accident data in their comments. If stilts shouldbe regulated, comments are requested on appropriate rules, if any, regardingtheir construction, use, fall protection (i.e., guardrail height), floorconditions (i.e., level, no holes, no debris), and other necessary considerations.17. Existing rules andSection;1910.28(a)(4) and andSection;1915.71(b)(1), andproposed rule andSection;1915.252(a)(1), require scaffolds to be capableof supporting, without failure, at least four times the maximum intendedload. In evaluating whether a scaffold meets this criteria, both the Agencyand the employer will need to have methods available to determine compliance.OSHA recognizes that field testing of scaffolds and scaffold componentswith loads four times greater than the maximum intended load could permanentlydamage and render useless the item being tested. Public comment is requestedon appropriate field test procedures or means of certification for determiningthe capacity of scaffolds and scaffold components such as planks and ropes.Comment is also requested concerning the qualifications that a person musthave in order to make these kinds of tests or determinations. 18. Paragraph 1.(b) of Appendix A requires wood scaffold planks to be selectedusing the grading rules established by a recognized independent inspectionagency for the species of wood used. Public comment is requested on whetheror not a more specific requirement should be stated, and, if so, what shouldthat requirement be? 19. Existing paragraphs (b)(16), (c)(4), (c)(5), (d)(11), and (e)(3) ofandSection;1910.28 require specified types of scaffold to be designed byan engineer when the scaffolds to be built will exceed the limits set forthin existing Tables D-7 through D-16. Proposed rules andSection;1915.253 (a)(10),(b)(11), (c)(6), and (f)(8) also require specified components and scaffoldtypes to be designed by an engineer when proposed Appendix A is not followed.However, there may be situations in which Appendix A could be safely modifiedby qualified persons. Public comment is requested on what scaffolds, ifany, could be safely designed by a qualified person rather than an engineer?Are there situations in which only an engineer will be able to safely modifyAppendix A? Also, while the existing tables and proposed Appendix A specifythe minimum size for many components, neither standard sets forth guidelinesfor every component used on scaffolds such as, but not limited to, baseplates, splice plates, joints, ties, and braces (the proposed rule, however,does specifically require all such components to meet the 4:1 capacityprovision). Public comment is requested on whether or not an engineer's services areneeded to design all components not presently included in the tables andguidelines of Appendix A. OSHA also requests information on the additionalcriteria which should be added to Appendix A in order to provide completetables and guidelines. In addition, OSHA requests public comment on whether or not there are othertypes of scaffolds, or conditions (such as evaluating the support systemfor interior hung scaffolds), in addition to those already covered, whereit would be appropriate to require the services of an engineer. If theservices of an engineer are not necessary, what are the training and experiencefactors an individual must have before being allowed to design a scaffoldsystem? 20. Paragraph (b)(8)(ii) of andSection;1915.252 requires that counterweightsbe made of non-flowable solid materials. Should OSHA also require thatcounterweights be designed for no other purpose than to counterweigh thesystem, thereby prohibiting the use of materials, such as concrete masonryunits, boxes, etc., as counterweights? Comments should include accidentand cost data. 21. Paragraph (b)(32) of andSection;1915.252 requires manually-powered hoiststo be built such that they require a positive crank force to lower thescaffold. This would eliminate the dangerous condition of ``free-running''hoists during descents. Public comment is requested on the need for thisrequirement. 22. Public comment is requested on whether landing platforms should berequired at 30-foot maximum intervals as required by andSection;1910.29(a)(3)(viii),or at 20-foot maximum intervals as required by proposed rule andSection;1915.252(c)(2)(iii).23. Paragraph (d)(13) of andSection;1915.252 prohibits the use of laddersor makeshift devices to raise the working level of employees. Public commentis requested on the need for this requirement. 24. Paragraph (n)(1) of andSection;1915.253 would limit the number of platformswhich may be used on catenary scaffolds. This is the same rule as in ANSIA10.8-1977, paragraph 22.4. The intent is to prohibit the overloading ofcatenary support systems. However, whereas the ANSI provision also setsforth maximum load criteria, the proposed OSHA provision does not. Thisis to keep the proposed provisions performance-oriented, and is consistentwith the approach used for all other types of scaffolds. However, publiccomment is requested as to what other criteria, if any, should be set forth.25. Paragraph (d)(10) of andSection;1915.252 requires shields to be usedwhen heat-producing processes are used on suspension scaffolds. Publiccomment is requested on what criteria, if any, should be set forth forsuch shields.26. In some of the existing provisions and in some of the proposed provisions,OSHA uses specific numerical limits to define and clarify the duties setforth. For example, proposed andSection; 1915.252(c)(7) restricts directaccess to scaffolds to those situations where the open distance betweenscaffold and building is not more than 14 inches horizontally and 24 inchesvertically; and proposed andSection; 1915.252(c)(2)(iv) requires rest platformsat 20-foot maximum intervals. These and other limits are based on existinglaws and consensus standards, and are used in lieu of more performance-orientedlanguage such as ``direct access shall be used only where the buildingand the scaffold are close enough to provide safe access;'' or languagewhich requires a numerical limit but then allows other configurations whichgive ``equivalent'' protection. OSHA believes that although such performance-orientedlanguage would be less restrictive on employers, and thus give them moreoptions when abating a hazard, it does not always tell the employer exactlywhat is required (i.e., how to do something ``right''). On the other hand,requiring specific numerical limits in the rule and allowing the employerto use other limits which the employer can show will provide ``equivalent''protection may respond to both these concerns. OSHA believes that the useof specific limits in certain provisions (such as those listed above, andthose for guardrail heights, minimum platform widths, and similar requirements)provides the required notice to employers as to how they can comply witha provision compared to how OSHA intends to enforce the provision. OSHAbelieves that such notice serves to inform employees and employers aboutthe proper way to do things; promotes consistency in hazard abatement atall worksites; and also minimizes legal disputes over the intent of a requirement.On the other hand, specification language can increase costs without increasingsafety, discourage technical innovation, prevent the use of safe alternatives,and fail to anticipate the varying needs and situations in the numerousworkplaces covered by the standard.Public comment is requested on whether or not OSHA's use of specificationlanguage is appropriate, or if it should be moved to a nonmandatory appendixwhich could provide guidance to employers. If not, how should the provisionsbe written to provide the desired flexibility and the required fair notice?If the continued use of such limits is appropriate, are the proposed limitssufficient to abate the hazards? Comments should include appropriate costand injury data.27. Specific provisions for crane and derrick suspended personnel platformsare presently set forth in andSection; 1915.71(b) (9) and (10) and are reproposedat andSection; 1915.253(t) (1) and (2). These provisions address the topicsof platform stability and attachment to the hook. In light of the July10, 1987 accident at San Diego, California, in which six lives were lost,OSHA requests public comment on the adequacy of these two provisions.Specifically, OSHA requests comments, including feasibility, cost, andrelated injury data, on whether the existing regulations and the proposedrules listed later in the document should be replaced by the following:Section 1915.251 Scope application and definitions applicable to this subpart.``Hoist'' (or ``hoisting'') means all crane or derrick functions such aslowering, lifting, swinging, booming in and out or up and down, or suspendinga personnel platform.``Runway'' means a firm, level surface designed, prepared and designatedas a path of travel for the weight and configuration of the crane beingused to lift and travel with a crane suspended platform. An existing surfacemay be used as long as it meets these criteria. Section 1915.252 General requirements. The following requirements apply to all scaffolds (except crane or derricksuspended personnel platforms which are covered in andSection; 1915.254)except as noted. Section 1915.254 Crane or derrick suspended personnel platforms. (a) <T3>General requirements. </T3>The personnel platform shall be conspicuouslyposted with a plate or other permanent marking which indicates the weightof the platform and its rated load capacity or maximum intended load. (b) <T3>Design. </T3>(1) The personnel platform and suspension system shallbe designed by a qualified engineer or a qualified person competent instructural design. (2) The suspension system shall be designed to minimize tipping of theplatform due to movement of employees occupying the platform. (c) <T3>Capacity. </T3>(1) Load lines shall be capable of supporting, withoutfailure, at least seven times the maximum intended load, except that whererotation resistant rope is used, the lines shall be capable of supportingwithout failure, at least ten times the maximum intended load. (2) Wire rope, shackles, rings, master links, and other rigging hardwaremust be capable of supporting, without failure, at least five times themaximum intended load applied or transmitted to that component. Where rotationresistant rope is used, the slings shall be capable of supporting withoutfailure at least ten times the maximum intended load. (3) The personnel platform itself, except the guardrail system and bodybelt/harness anchorages, shall be capable of supporting, without failure,its own weight and at least five times the maximum intended load. Criteriafor guardrail systems and body belt/harness anchorages are contained inother Subparts of this part. (d) <T3>Crane and derrick criteria. </T3>In addition to the requirements forcranes and derricks set forth in other subparts, cranes and derricks usedto support personnel platforms shall conform to the following provisions:(1) Cranes and derricks with variable angle booms shall be equipped witha boom angle indicator, readily visable to the operator. (2) Cranes with telescoping booms shall be equipped with a device to indicateclearly to the operator, at all times, the boom's extended length, or anaccurate determination of the load radius to be used during the lift shallbe made prior to hoisting personnel. (3) A positive acting device shall be used which prevents contact betweenthe load block or overhaul ball and the boom tip (anti-two-blocking device),or a system shall be used which deactivates the hoisting action beforedamage occurs in the event of a two-blocking situation (two block damageprevention feature).(4) The load line hoist drum shall have a system or device on the powertrain, other than the load hoist brake, which regulates the lowering rateof speed of the hoist mechanism (controlled load lowering.)(5) Hooks on overhaul ball assemblies, lower load blocks, or other attachmentassemblies shall be of a type that can be closed and locked, eliminatingthe hook throat opening. Alternatively, an alloy anchor type shackle witha bolt, nut and retaining pin may be used. (e) <T3>Platform criteria. </T3>(1) Each personnel platform shall be equippedwith a Type I guardrail system that conforms to the criteria set forthin andSection; 1915.252(e)(4). In addition, the platform shall be enclosedfrom the toebord to midrail with either solid construction or expandedmetal having openings no greater than one-half inch (1.27 cm). (2) A grab rail shall be installed inside the entire perimeter of the personnelplatform. (3) Access gates, if installed, shall not swing outward during hoisting.(4) Access gates, including sliding or folding gates, shall be equippedwith a restraining device to prevent accidental opening. (5) Headroom shall be provided which allows employees to stand uprightin the platform. (6) In addition to the use of hard hats, employees shall be protected byoverhead protection on the personnel platform when employees are exposedto falling objects. (7) All rough edges exposed to contact by employees shall be surfaced orsmoothed in order to prevent injury to employees from punctures or lacerations.(8) All welding of the personnel platform and its components shall be performedby a qualified welder familiar with the weld grades, types and materialspecified in the platform design. (9) When a wire rope bridle is used to connect the personnel platform tothe load line, each bridle leg shall be connected to a master link or shacklein such a manner to ensure that the load is evenly divided among the bridlelegs. (10) All eyes in wire rope slings shall be fabricated with thimbles. (f) <T3>Trial lift, inspection, and proof testing.</T3> (1) A trial lift withthe unoccupied personnel platform loaded at least to the anticipated liftweightshall be made from ground level, or any other location where employeeswill enter the platform, to each location at which the personnel platformis to be positioned. This trial lift shall be performed immediately priorto placing personnel in the platform. The operator shall determine thatall systems, controls, and safety devices are activated and functioningproperly; that no interferences exist; and that all configurations necessaryto reach those work locations will allow the operator to remain under the50 percent limit of the hoist's rated capacity. Materials and tools tobe used during the actual lift can be loaded in the platform, as providedin paragraphs (h)(4) and (5) of this section for the trial lift. A singletrial lift may be performed at one time for all locations that are to bereached from a single set up position. (2) The trial lift shall be repeated prior to hoisting employees wheneverthe crane or derrick is moved and set up in a new location or returnedto a previously used location. Additionally, the trial lift shall be repeatedwhen the lift route is changed unless the operator determines that theroute change is not significant (i.e., the route change would not affectthe safety of hoisted employees.) (3) After the trial lift and just prior to hoisting personnel, the platformshall be hoisted a few inches and inspected to ensure that it is secureand properly balanced. (4) A visual inspection of the crane or derrick, rigging, personnel platform,and the crane or derrick base support or ground shall be conducted by acompetent person immediately after the trial lift to determine whetherthe testing has exposed any defect or produced any adverse effect uponany component or structure. (5) Any defects found during inspections which create a safety hazard shallbe corrected before hoisting personnel. (6) At each job site, prior to hoisting employees on the personnel platform,and after any repair or modification, the platform and rigging shall beproof tested to 125 percent of the platform's rated capacity by holdingit in a suspended position for five minutes with the test load evenly distributedon the platform (this may be done concurrently with the trial lift). Afterproof testing, a capable person shall inspect the platform and rigging.Any deficiencies found shall be corrected and another proof test shallbe conducted. Personnel hoisting shall not be conducted until the prooftesting requirements are satisfied. (g) <T3>Pre-lift meeting.</T3> (1) A meeting attended by the crane or derrickoperator, signal person(s) (if necessary for the lift), employee(s) tobe lifted, and the person responsible for the task to be performed shallbe held to review the appropriate requirements of andSection; 1915.254 andthe procedures to be followed. (2) This meeting shall be held prior to the trial lift at each new worklocation, and shall be repeated for any employees newly assigned to theoperation. (h) <T3>Personnel platform loading.</T3> (1) The personnel platform shall notbe loaded in excess of its rated load capacity. When a personnel platformdoes not have a rated load capacity, then the personnel platform shallnot be loaded in excess of its maximum intended load. (2) The number of employees occupying the personnel platform shall notexceed the number required for the work being performed. (3) Personnel platforms shall be used only for employees, their tools,and the materials necessary to do their work, and shall not be used tohoist only materials or tools when not hoisting personnel. (4) Materials and tools for use during a personnel lift shall be securedto prevent displacement. (5) Materials and tools for use during a personnel lift shall be evenlydistributed within the confines of the platform while the platform is suspended.(6) The total weight of the loaded personnel platform and related riggingshall not exceed 50 percent of the rated capacity for the radius and configurationof the crane or derrick. (i) <T3>Use and operational criteria. </T3>(1) The use of machines having livebooms (booms in which lowering is controlled by a brake without aid fromother devices which slow the lowering speeds) is prohibited. (2) Bridles and associated rigging for attaching the personnel platformto the hoist line shall be used only for the platform and the necessaryemployees, their tools and the materials necessary to do their work, andshall not be used for any other purpose when not hoisting personnel. (3) The crane shall be uniformly level within one percent of level gradeand located on firm footing. Cranes equipped with outriggers shall havethem all fully deployed following manufacturer's specifications, insofaras applicable, when hoisting employees. (4) Hoisting of the personnel platform shall be performed in a slow, controlled,cautious manner with no sudden movements of the crane or derrick, or theplatform. (5) Load and boom hoist drum brakes, swing brakes, and locking devicessuch as pawls or dogs shall be engaged when the occupied personnel platformis in a stationary working position. (6) Free fall is prohibited. (7) Employees shall not be hoisted unless the following conditions aredetermined to exist: (i) Hoist ropes shall be free of kinks; (ii) Multiple part lines shall not be twisted around each other; (iii) The primary attachment shall be centered over the platform and (iv) The hoisting system shall be inspected if the load rope is slack toensure all ropes are properly seated on drums and in sheaves. (8) Employees shall keep all parts of the body inside the platform duringraising, lowering, and positioning. This provision does not apply to anoccupant of the platform performing the duties of a signal person. (9) Before employees exit or enter a hoisted personnel platform that isnot landed, the platform shall be secured to the structure where the workis to be performed, unless securing to the structure creates an unsafesituation. (10) Tag lines shall be used unless their use creates an unsafe condition.(11) The crane or derrick operator shall remain at the controls at alltimes when the crane engine is running and the platform is occupied. (12) Hoisting of employees shall be promptly discontinued upon indicationof any dangerous weather conditions or other impending danger. (13) Employees being hoisted shall remain in continuous sight of and indirect communication with the operator or signal person. In those situationswhere direct visual contact with the operator is not possible and the useof a signal person would create a greater hazard for that person, directcommunication alone such as by radio may be used. (14) Except over water, employees occupying the personnel platform shalluse a body belt/harness system with lanyard appropriately attached to thelower load block or overhaul ball, or to a structural member within thepersonnel platform capable of supporting a fall impact for employees usingthe anchorage. (15) No lifts shall be made on another of the crane's or derrick's loadlineswhile personnel are suspended on a platform. (16) Hoisting of employees while the crane is traveling is prohibited,except for portal, tower and locomotive cranes, or where the employer demonstratesthat there is no less hazardous way to perform the work. (17) Under any circumstances where a crane would travel while hoistingpersonnel, the employer shall implement the following procedures to safeguardemployees: (i) Crane travel shall be restricted to a fixed track or runway. (ii) Travel is limited to the load radius of the boom used during the lift.(iii) The boom must be parallel to the direction of travel. (iv) A complete trial run shall be performed to test the route of travelbefore employees are allowed to occupy the platform. This trial run canbe performed at the same time as the trial lift required by paragraph (f)(1)of this section which tests the route of the lift. (v) If trael is done with a rubber tired carrier, the condition and airpressure of the tires shall be checked. The chart capacity for lifts onrubber shall be used for application of the 50 percent reduction. Notwithstandingparagraph (i)(3) of this section, outriggers may be partially retractedas necessary for travel. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. American National Standard ANSI A10.8-1977, ``Safety Requirementsfor Scaffolding,'' American National Standards Institute, New York.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Wang Associates, Inc., ``Study of Distance Between Structural Walland Scaffold,'' June 13, 1979, Unpublished.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Chaffin and Stobbe, ``Ergonomic Considerations Related to SelectedFall Prevention Aspects of Scaffolds and Ladders as Presented in OSHA Standard29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart D,'' University of Michigan, September 1979.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, ``InjuriesResulting From Falls From Elevations,'' Bulletin 2195, June 1984.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Fattal, Cattaneo, Turner, and Robinson, ``Personnel Guardrailsfor the Prevention of Occupational Accidents,'' Center for Building Technology,Institute for Applied Technology, National Bureau of Standards, Washington,D.C., July 1976 (NBSIR 76-1132).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Fattal and Cattaneo, ``Investigation of Guardrails for the Protectionof Employees from Occupational Hazards,'' Center for Building Technology,Institute for Applied Technology, National Bureau of Standards, Washington,D.C., July 1976 (NBSIR 76-1139).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Chaffin, Miodonski, Stobbe, Boydstun, and Armstrong, ``An ErgonomicBasis for Recommendations Pertaining to Specific Sections of OSHA Standard,29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart D_Walking and Working Surface,'' Department ofIndustrial and Operations Engineering College of Engineering, the Universityof Michigan, March 1978.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment and Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis</ITAG>Introduction and SummaryIn accordance with Executive Order No. 12291 (46 FR 13193, February 17,1981), OSHA has analyzed the economic impact of this proposed standard.Under the criteria established in E.O. 12291, OSHA has determined thatthe promulgation of this proposed revision would not be a ``major'' action.The expected annualized costs of full compliance would be about $48,000.Background Under Executive Order 12291, OSHA is required, in general, to submit anyNotice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) for ``all rules other than major rules''to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) at least 10days prior to publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.In light of the data currently available to OSHA, the economic impact estimatespresented in this preamble are rough estimates which are likely to be refinedas OSHA receives additional information.OSHA solicits further comments on the estimates presented in this preambleand those comments will be addressed and incorporated in the RegulatoryImpact Assessment (RIA) for the final rule.Data SourcesThe primary source for this section is the November 1985, Draft Final Reportby CONSAD Research Corporation entitled, ``Data to Support a RegulatoryAnalysis of the Proposed Standard for Shipbuilding and Repairing.'' Inaddition, OSHA also used an October 1984 report by Main Hurdman/KMG entitled,``Profile of the Shipbuilding and Repairing Industry.''Industry ProfileThe entire shipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking industries wouldbe affected by the proposed consolidation of the scaffold sections of theexisting Part 1915, Subpart E, and the existing Part 1910, Subpart D, becausescaffolds are used extensively in all shipyards. In recent years, shipyardshave not prospered as an industry. By way of illustration, there were about305 shipyards operating in 1986 which is fewer than half of the 687 shipyardsactive in 1982. Another illustration is that there were orders for 69 merchantvessels (1.82 million tons) in U.S. shipyards in 1980 but no new ordersfor merchant vessels since 1985. Although this loss of business has beenpartially offset by the increase in the U.S. Navy's demands for ships,the decline in the demand for commercial ships will likely generate a furtherdecline in the number of active shipyards.Population-at-RiskOSHA has estimated that approximately 13 percent of shipyard employeesfrequently work on scaffolds. The actual number of these employees willdepend upon the level of shipyard work. For example, shipyards employed177,300 workers in 1980 and about 136,300 workers in 1986. Thus, the numberof workers at risk from injuries associated with work on scaffolds wouldhave been about 23,000 in 1980 and about 17,700 in 1986. Consequently,given the potential for large changes in the demand for this industry'sproduct, OSHA has estimated that the population-at-risk would be between17,700 and 23,000 employees.Risk of Fatality or InjuryOSHA has estimated that the annual number of injuries in shipyards dueto falls from scaffolds was between 240 and 385 between 1981 and 1986.Of these injuries, 120 to 220 were lost workday injuries. As the averagenumber of lost workdays per lost workday injury was 31.8, OSHA has estimatedthat the annual number of lost workdays in shipyards due to falls fromscaffolds would be between 3,815 days and 6,995 days.In addition, OSHA has determined that there would be between one and twoannual fatalities in shipyards associated with falls from scaffolds.Feasibility, Benefits, and CostsOSHA has determined that this proposed standard would be technologicallyfeasible because it would permit the use of existing and readily availabletechnology and equipment.There are two potential sources of benefits from this proposed standard.The first source is the benefits that would accrue to those workers whoare at risk from current practices involving scaffolds in shipyards. OSHAbelieves that the proposed consolidation of Parts 1910 and 1915 would likelylead to an increase in future compliance levels because consolidating twosets of scaffold requirements into one set would clarify the rules. Inaddition, the proposal substitutes performance language for much of theexisting specification language. Consequently, it could make complianceless costly, while maintaining employee safety. Thus, the proposed consolidationmay lead to an increase in compliance which, in turn, may lead to an increasein employee safety on scaffolds.The second source is the benefits and decreased costs that should accrueto those employers who would be allowed to use certain safety systems andequipment that are not allowed by the existing specification requirementsbut would provide the same level of employee safety as that generated bythe specifications. The use of these systems and equipment would allowemployers to provide the necessary level of safety to their employees atless cost than is possible under the existing standards.OSHA does not have any quantitative estimates of these potential benefitsand is requesting information and comments on this issue. As this is aPreliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment (PRIA), all comments will be carefullyanalyzed by OSHA for incorporation into the RIA for the final rule.The basis of the estimated costs of compliance with the proposed standardis the CONSAD Report. In order to obtain this information, CONSAD circulatedcopies of the draft proposed standards to the two major industry tradeassociations and to individual shipbuilders. CONSAD then employed telephonequestionnaires and site visits to elicit information concerning the potentialeconomic impact of the provisions contained in the draft proposed consolidatedstandard. The information was used by CONSAD to develop its estimates ofthe costs of compliance and those costs have been adopted by OSHA as theexpected costs of compliance with the proposed standards.Based on the CONSAD report, OSHA has determined that there are three provisionsthat would generate costs of compliance. The first provision would requirethat the front edge of all scaffold platforms be no more than 14 inchesfrom the face of the vessel or structure unless guardrails or body beltsystems are used. This provision would require an increased use of bodybelts for employees working on hulls or other curved sections of structures.The second provision would prohibit the use of ladders on top of scaffolds.This provision would require that some additional scaffold be erected toreach a higher level rather than using a ladder to reach the desired height.The third provision would prohibit workers from riding on mobile scaffoldsunless the surface on which the scaffold is moving is level and free ofpits, holes, and obstructions. This provision would involve some productivitylosses because the employee would have to descend from the mobile scaffoldbefore it could be moved.Using the baseline of existing industry practice, OSHA has estimated theannualized costs of compliance with the proposed consolidation to be about$48,000 for those three provisions. Nevertheless, as previously mentioned,this is a preliminary RIA and OSHA invites public comment concerning thisestimate. Any comment received will be carefully analyzed by OSHA for incorporationinto the RIA for this final rule.Regulatory Flexibility CertificationPursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Assistant Secretary has preliminarily certifiedthat the proposal would not have a significant impact upon a substantialnumber of small entities. OSHA invites public comment concerning this certification.The important criterion that governs a Regulatory Flexibility Analysisis whether the proposed standard would impose significant costs upon smallentities. ``Significance'' is determined by the impact upon profits, marketshare, and on the entity's financial viability. In particular, the proposedstandard's effect upon small entities relative to that upon large entitiesneeds to be specifically evaluated. That is, OSHA must determine whetherthe proposal would have a relatively greater negative effect on small entitiesthan on large entities, thereby putting small entities at a competitivedisadvantage.The proposed standard, however, has no changes that would require significantcapital expenditures. Furthermore, as these proposed provisions are moreperformance-oriented than specification-oriented, small entities can usecost-effective methods of employee protection best suited to their particularwork situations. The costs of compliance with the proposed standard primarilydepend upon the amount of scaffold footage and upon the number of employees,both of which typically depend upon the size of the firm. There are, however,some economies of scale in compliance and the costs of compliance expressedas a percentage of total revenues would be slightly larger for very smallfirms (fewer than 50 employees) than for very large firms (greater than1,000 employees). Nevertheless, these compliance costs would be a minimalcomponent of the overall cost of the shipyard production. As a result,this proposed standard would not put small entities at a competitive disadvantagerelative to large entities.Thus, OSHA has concluded that this proposed standard would not have a significantadverse impact upon a substantial number of small entities.The assessment is available for inspection and copying at the OSHA TechnicalData Center, Room N-3670, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC20210. OSHA invites comments concerning the conclusions reached in boththe Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment and the Regulatory FlexibilityCertification.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Environment Assessment</ITAG>Finding of No Significant ImpactThis proposed rule and its major alternatives have been reviewed in accordancewith the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321 <T3>et seq</T3>.), the Guidelines of the Council on Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and OSHA's DOL NEPA Procedures (29 CFR Part 11).As a result of this review, the Assistant Secretary for OSHA has determinedthat the proposed rule will have no significant environmental impact.The proposed revisions focus on the reduction of accidents or injuriesby means of work practices and procedures, proper use and handling of equipment.The proposal also contains language, definition, and format changes. Theserevisions do not impact on air, water, or soil quality, plant or animallife, the use of land, or other aspects of the environment. Therefore,these revisions are categorized as excluded actions according to SubpartB, Section 11.10, of the DOL NEPA regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Recordkeeping</ITAG>This proposal contains no recordkeeping requirements. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Public Participation</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to submit written data, views, and argumentswith respect to this proposal. The comments must be postmarked by February27, 1989, and submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Office, Docket S-047,U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration,Room N-2634, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.The data, views, and arguments that are submitted will be available forpublic inspection and copying at the above address. All timely submissionsreceived will be made a part of the record of this proceeding.Additionally, under section 6(b)(3) of the OSHA Act (29 U.S.C. 655) and29 CFR 1911.11, interested persons may file objections to the proposaland request an informal hearing. The objections and hearing request shouldbe submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Officer at the address aboveand must comply with the following conditions:1. The objections and hearing requests must include the name, and addressof the individual or organization making the objection or request;2. The objections and hearing requests must be postmarked by February 27,1989.3. The objections and hearing requests must specify with particularitythe provisions of the proposed rule to which each objection is taken orabout which the hearing request is made, and must state the grounds therefor;4. Each objection and hearing request must be separately stated and numbered;and5. The objections and hearing requests must be accompanied by a detailedsummary of the evidence proposed to be adduced at the requested hearing.Interested persons who have objections to various provisions or have changesto recommend may of course make these objections or recommendations intheir comments and OSHA will fully consider them. There is only need tofile formal ``objections'' separately if the interested person requestsa public hearing.OSHA recognizes that there may also be interested persons who, throughtheir knowledge of safety or their experience in the operations involved,would wish to endorse or support certain provisions in the standard. OSHAwelcomes such supportive comments, including any pertinent accident dataor cost information which may be available, in order that the record ofthis rulemaking will present a balanced picture of the public responseon the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. State Plan States</ITAG>The 25 States and territories having OSHA-approved occupational safetyand health plans which cover the issues of maritime safety and health mustrevise their existing standard within six months of the publication dateof the final standard or show OSHA why there is no need for action, e.g.,because an existing State standard covering this area is already ``at leastas effective as'' the revised Federal standard. Currently, five States(California, Minnesota, Oregon, Vermont and Washington) with their ownState plans cover private sector on-shore maritime activities. FederalOSHA enforces maritime standards offshore in all states and provides onshorecoverage of maritime activities in Federal OSHA States and in the followingState plan States and territories: Alaska, Arizona, Connecticut \1\<NOTE/>, Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Nevada,New Mexico, New York,\1\ North Carolina, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee,Utah, Virginia, Virgin Islands, and Wyoming. (All States with State plansmust also extend coverage to State and local government employees engagedin maritime activities.)<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Plan covers only State and local government employees.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1915</ITAG>Guardrail systems, Marine safety, Occupational safety and health, Safety,Ship repair, Shipyard employment, Vessels.<ITAG tagnum="84">Authority</ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of John A. Pendergrass,Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6, and 8 of the Occupational Safetyand Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), section 41 of the Longshoreand Harbor Worker's Compensation Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. 941), Secretaryof Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736) and 29 CFR Part 1911, it is proposedto amend 29 CFR Part 1915 as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 17th day of November, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1915_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1915 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 41, Longshore and Harbor Workers' CompensationAct (33 U.S.C. 941); Secs. 4, 6, and 8, Occupational Safety and HealthAct of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71(36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736) as applicable;and 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. 29 CFR Part 1915 would be amended by adding a new Subpart N to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart N_Scaffolds</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.251 Scope, application and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.252 General requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.253 Additional requirements applicable to specific types of scaffolds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A to Subpart N_Scaffold Specifications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart N_Scaffolds</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.251 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope, application and definitions applicable to this subpart</ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application.</T3> (1) This subpart applies to all scaffoldsused in shipyard workplaces and operations (including shipbuilding, shiprepairing, and shipbreaking), but does not apply to construction operationsin shipyards covered under 29 CFR Part 1926.(2) The provisions of 29 CFR 1910.28 and 1910.29 do not apply to shipyardworkplaces and operations.(b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> ``Adjustable suspension scaffold'' means a suspensionscaffold equipped with hoists that can be operated by employees on thescaffold.``Bearer'' means a horizontal transverse scaffold member (which may besupported by ledgers or runners) upon which the scaffold platform restsand which joins scaffold uprights, posts, poles, and similar members.``Boatswain's chair'' means a single point adjustable suspension scaffoldconsisting of a seat or sling designed to accommodate one employee in asitting position.``Body belt (safety belt)'' means a strap with means for securing aboutthe waist or body and for attaching to a lanyard, lifeline, or decelerationdevice.``Body belt/harness system (personal fall arrest system)'' means a combinationof body belt, or body harness, and lanyard, deceleration device, lifeline,and point of anchorage.``Body harness'' means a design of straps which is secured about the employeein a manner to distribute the arresting forces over at least the thighs,shoulders, and pelvis, with provisions for attaching a lanyard, lifeline,or deceleration device.``Brace'' means a tie that holds one scaffold member in a fixed positionwith respect to another member. ``Brace'' also means a rigid type connectionholding a scaffold to a vessel, vessel section, building, or structure.``Bracket scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by brackets attached to a vessel, vessel section, building, orstructural wall.``Capable person'' means one who is capable of identifying existing andpredictable hazards in the surroundings or working conditions which areunsanitary, hazardous, or dangerous to employees, and who has authorizationto take prompt corrective measures to eliminate them.``Catenary scaffold'' means a suspension scaffold consisting of a platformfastened to two essentially horizontal and parallel ropes, which are securedto structural members.``Cleat'' menas structural members used at the ends of platform units toprevent the units from slipping off their supports. Cleats are also usedto provide footing on sloped surfaces such as crawling boards.``Coupler'' means a device for locking together the component tubes ofa tube and coupler scaffold.``Crawling board (chicken ladder)'' means a supported scaffold consistingof a plank with cleats spaced and secured to provide footing, for use onsloped surfaces such as roofs.``Deceleration device'' means any mechanism, such as a rope grab, rip-stitchlanyard, specially-woven lanyard, and automatic self-retracting lifeline,which serves to dissipate more energy during a fall arrest than does astandard line or strap webbing lanyard.``Double pole (independent pole) scaffold'' means a supported scaffoldconsisting of platforms resting on cross beams supported by ledgers anda double row of uprights independent of support (except ties, guys, braces)from any structure.``Dropline'' means a suspended vertical line, independent of the work platform,for direct attachment to a worker's body belt, body harness, lanyard, ordeceleration device.``Equivalent'' means alternative designs, materials, or methods which theemployer can demonstrate will provide an equal or greater degree of safetyfor employees than the method or item specified in the standard.``Exposed power lines'' means electrical power lines which are accessibleto employees and not shielded from contact. Such lines do not include extensioncords or power tool cords.``Fabricated decking and planking'' means manufactured platform units madeof wood (including laminated wood and solid sawn wood planks), metal orother materials.``Fabricated frame scaffold (tubular welded frame scaffold)'' means a supportedor suspended scaffold consisting of a platform(s) supported on fabricatedend frames with integral posts, horizontal bearers, and intermediate members.``Failure'' means load refusal, breakage, or separation of component parts.Load refusal is the point where the ultimate strength is exceeded.``Float (ship) scaffold'' means a suspension scaffold consisting of a bracedplatform resting upon two parallel bearers and hung from overhead supportsby ropes of fixed length.``Guardrail system'' means a vertical barrier, normally consisting of,but not limited to, an assembly of toprails, midrails, and posts, erectedto prevent employees from falling off a scaffold platform or walkway toa lower level. Type I guardrail systems are those systems capable of providingadequate fall protection without the use of body belts. Type II guardrailsystems are those systems which serve as scaffold edge delineators, restrainmovement, provide handholds, prevent misstepping, and which must be supplementedby body belt systems to provide adequate fall protection.``Hoist'' means a mechanical device to raise or lower a suspended scaffold.It can be either manually or mechanically power-operated.``Horse scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by construction horses.``Independent pole scaffold'' (See ``Double pole scaffold.'')``Interior hung scaffold'' means a suspension scaffold consisting of aplatform suspended from the ceiling, overhead, or roof structure by fixedlength supports.``Ladder jack scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by brackets attached to ladders.``Ladder stand'' means a mobile, fixed-size, self-supporting ladder consistingof a wide flat tread ladder in the form of stairs.``Lean-to scaffold'' means a supported scaffold which is kept erect bytilting it toward and resting it against a vessel, vessel section, building,or structure.``Ledger'' means a horizontal scaffold member upon which bearers rest.It is the longitudinal member which joins scaffold uprights, posts, poles,and similar members.``Lower levels'' means those areas to which an employee can fall. Suchareas include ground levels, decks, flats, docks, floors, roofs, ramps,gangways grates, piers, wharves, runways, excavations, pits, tanks, materials,water, equipment, and other surfaces.``Maximum intended load'' means the total load of all employees, equipment,tools, materials, transmitted loads, wind loads, and other loads reasonablyanticipated to be applied to a scaffold or scaffold component at any onetime.``Mechanically-powered hoist'' means a hoist which is powered by otherthan human energy.``Mobile scaffold'' means a powered or unpowered, portable, caster or wheel-mountedsupported scaffold. Such scaffolds do not include crane or derrick suspendedpersonnel platforms.``Multi-level suspended scaffold'' means a two-point or multi-point adjustablesuspension scaffold with a series of platforms at various levels supportedby common stirrups.``Multi-point adjustable suspension scaffold'' means a suspension scaffoldconsisting of a platform or platforms suspended by more than two ropesfrom overhead supports and equipped with means to permit the raising andlowering of the platform to desired work levels.``Needle beam scaffold'' means a suspension scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by needle beams.``Open sides and ends'' means the edges of a platform that are more than14 inches (36 cm) away horizontally from a sturdy, continuous, verticalsurface (such as a vessel's hull, bulkhead, or building wall) or a sturdy,continuous horizontal surface (such as a floor or deck), or a point ofaccess.``Outrigger'' means the structural member of a supported scaffold usedto increase the base width of a scaffold in order to provide greater stabilityfor the scaffold.``Outrigger beam'' means the structural member of a suspension scaffoldor outrigger scaffold which provides support for the scaffold by extendingthe scaffold point of attachment to a point out and away from the vessel,vessel section, building, or structure.``Outrigger scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by outrigger beams (thrustouts) projecting beyond the wall orface of the vessel, vessel section, building, or structure, the inboardends of which are secured inside the building or structure.``Platform'' means the horizontal working surface of a scaffold.``Platform unit'' means the individual wood planks, fabricated planks,fabricated decks, and fabricated platforms which comprise the platformsand walkways of a scaffold.``Pole scaffold'' (See definitions for ``Single-pole scaffold'' and ``Double(independent) pole scaffold.'')``Qualified person'' means one who, by possession of a recognized degree,certificate, or professional standing, or who by extensive knowledge, training,and experience, has successfully demonstrated the ability to solve or resolvesafety problems relating to the subject matter, the work, or the project.``Runner'' means the lengthwise horizontal bracing or bearing member whichsupports bearers on tube and coupler scaffolds.``Scaffold'' means any temporary elevated platform (supported or suspended),and its supporting structure, used for supporting employees or materialsor both.``Self-contained adjustable scaffold'' means a combination supported andsuspension scaffold consisting of an adjustable platform(s) mounted onan independent supporting frame(s) not a part of the object being workedon, and which is equipped with a means to permit the raising and loweringof the platform(s) to desired work levels. Such systems include rollingroof rigs and rolling outrigger systems.``Shore scaffold'' means a supported scaffold which is kept erect by placingit against a vessel, vessel section, building, or structure and holdingit in place with props.``Single-point adjustable suspension scaffold'' means a suspension scaffoldconsisting of a platform suspended by one rope from an overhead supportand equipped with means to permit the movement of the platform to desiredwork levels. Such scaffolds do not include crane or derrick suspended personnelplatforms.``Single-pole scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of platformsresting on bearers, the outside ends of which are supported on ledgerssecured to a single row of posts or uprights, and the inner ends of whichare supported on or in a vessel, vessel section, building, or structure.``Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffold'' means a supported scaffoldconsisting of a platform supported directly on the rungs of step laddersor trestle ladders.``Supported scaffold'' means one or more working platforms supported byoutrigger beams, brackets, poles, legs, uprights, posts, frames, or similarrigid support.``Suspension scaffold'' means one or more working platforms suspended byropes or other non-rigid means from an overhead structure(s).``Trolley line'' means means a horizontal line for direct attachment toa worker's body belt, lanyard, or deceleration device.``Tube and coupler scaffold (independent pole metal scaffold)'' means asupported or suspended scaffold consisting of platforms supported by individualpieces of tubing, erected with coupling devices connecting uprights, braces,bearers, and runners. ``Tubular welded frame scaffold'' (See definition for ``fabricated framescaffold.'')``Two-point suspension scaffold (swing stage) (painters' suspended scaffolds)''means a suspension scaffold consisting of a platform supported by hangers(stirrups) suspended by two ropes from overhead supports and equipped withmeans to permit the raising and lowering of the platform to desired worklevels.``Unstable objects'' means those items which do not properly distributethe loads imposed on them and which, therefore, do not constitute a properbase support for scaffolds, platform units, or employees. Examples of suchobjects include, but are not limited to, barrels, boxes, loose brick, andconcrete blocks.``Vertical pickup'' means a rope used to support the horizontal rope incatenary scaffolds.``Walkway'' means a portion of a scaffold platform used only for accessand not as a work level.``Window jack scaffold'' means a supported scaffold consisting of a platformsupported by a bracket or jack which projects through a window opening.``Worklevel'' means an elevated platform used for supporting employeesand their materials, where work activities are performed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.252</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements.</ITAG>The following requirements apply to all scaffolds, except as indicated:(a) <T3>Capacity.</T3> Scaffold components and connections shall have the followingcapacities:(1) Each scaffold and scaffold component, except suspension ropes and guardrailsystems, shall be capable of supporting, without failure, its own weightand a least four times the maximum intended load to be applied or transmittedto that component. The criteria for suspension ropes is set forth in paragraph(a)(4) of this section, and the criteria for guardrail systems is set forthin paragraph (e) of this section.(2) Direct connections (to roofs, floors, hulls, and decks) and counterweights,used to resist the tipping forces on suspension scaffolds, shall be capableof providing a resisting force of at least four times the tipping force.(3) Each suspension rope shall be capable of supporting, without failure,at least six times the maximum intended load applied or transmitted tothat rope.(4) Suspension ropes shall also meet the following requirements (criteriafor ropes supporting boatswains' chairs are set forth in andSection; 1915.253(k)):(i) Ropes supporting adjustable suspension scaffolds shall be of a diameterlarge enough to provide sufficient surface area for the functioning ofbrake and hoist mechanisms;(ii) Ropes supporting catenary scaffolds shall be equivalent in strengthto at least one-half (\1/2\) inch (1.3 cm) diameter improved plow steelwire ropes;(iii) Ropes supporting float (ship) scaffolds and needle beam scaffoldsshall be equivalent in strength to at least one inch (2.5 cm) diameterfirst grade manila ropes.(b) <T3>Construction.</T3> (1) Platforms, except those used as walkways, onall working levels on all scaffolds shall be fully planked or decked withplatform units between the front uprights and the guardrail supports asfollows.(i) Platform units shall be placed as close as possible to adjacent units.Any space between adjacent units shall be no more than one inch (2.5 cm)wide except as necessary to fit around uprights when side brackets areused to extend the width of the platform.(ii) Where full planking or decking cannot be obtained using standard widthunits, the platform shall be planked or decked as fully as possible; however,the remaining open space between the platform and guardrail supports shallnot exceed nine and one-half inches (24.1 cm).(2) All scaffold platforms and walkways shall be at least 18 inches (46cm) wide except ladder jack scaffolds shall be a minimum of 12 inches (30cm) wide, and boatswains' chairs may be any size.(3) Emergency descent devices shall not be used as working platforms.(4) The front edge of all platforms, except those on outrigger scaffolds,shall be positioned not more than 14 inches (36 cm) from the face of thevessel, vessel section, building, or structure being worked on, unlessType I guardrails are erected along the open edge or body belt/harnesssystems are used to protect employees from falling. The maximum distancefor outrigger scaffolds shall be three inches (8 cm).(5) Each end of a platform unit, unless cleated or otherwise restrainedby hooks or equivalent means, shall extend over its support not less thansix inches (15 cm).(6) Each end of a platform unit shall not extend over its support morethan 18 inches (46 cm), unless the unit is designed, capable, and installedto support employees without tipping or is guarded to prevent access ofemployees to the cantilevered end.(7) On scaffolds where platform units are abutted to create a long platform,each abutted end shall rest on a separate support, butt plate, or equivalentmeans of support.(8) On scaffolds where platform units are overlapped to create a long platform,the overlap shall occur only over supports, and shall not be less than12 inches (30 cm) long unless the platform units are nailed together orotherwise restrained to prevent movement.(9) At all points of a scaffold where the platform changes direction, suchas turning a corner, any platform unit that rests on a bearer at an angleother than a right angle shall be laid first, and platform units whichrest at right angles over the same bearer shall be laid second, on topof the first units.(10) Wood platform units shall not be covered with opaque finishes, exceptthat unit edges may be covered or marked for purposes of identification,and units used in reactor plants may be coated where necessary to preventcontamination. Platform units may be coated periodically with wood preservatives,fire-retardant finishes, and slip-resistant finishes; however, the coatingmay not obscure the top or bottom wood surfaces.(11) Scaffold components manufactured by different manufacturers shallnot be intermixed unless the component parts fit together without force.Scaffold components manufactured by different manufacturers shall not bemodified in order to intermix them unless the resulting scaffold is determinedby a capable person to be structurally sound. (12) Scaffold components made of dissimilar metals shall not be used togetherunless a capable person has determined that galvanic action will not reducethe strength of any component to a level below that required by andSection;1915.252(a)(1). (13) Supported scaffolds with a height to base width (including outriggersupports, if used) ratio of more than four to one shall be restrained fromtipping by guying, tying, bracing, or equivalent means, as follows: (i) Guys, braces, or ties shall be provided at heights not to exceed thefirst multiple in height of the four to one ratio and at intervals notto exceed 20 feet (6.1 m) thereafter. (ii) Guys, ties and braces shall be installed at each end of the scaffoldand at horizontal intervals not to exceed 30 feet (9.1 m) (measured fromone end towards the other). (14) Supported scaffold poles, legs, posts, frames, and uprights shallbear on base plates and mud sills or other adequate firm foundation. (i) Such footings shall be level, sound, rigid, and capable of supportingthe scaffold in a loaded condition without settling or displacement. (ii) Unstable objects shall not be used to support scaffolds or platformunits. (iii) Unstable objects shall not be used as working platforms. (15) Supported scaffold poles, legs, posts, frames, and uprights shallbe plumb and braced to prevent swaying and displacement. (16) All suspension scaffold support devices such as outrigger beams, cornicehooks, parapet clamps, and similar devices, shall rest on surfaces capableof supporting the reaction forces imposed by the scaffold hoist operatingat its maximum rated load. (17) Suspension scaffold outrigger beams, when used, shall be made of structuralmetal and shall be restrained to prevent movement. (18) The inboard ends of suspension scaffold outrigger beams shall be stabilizedby bolts or other direct connections to the floor, roof, or deck, or theyshall have their inboard ends stabilized by counterweights. (i) Before use, direct connections shall be evaluated by a capable personwho shall certify, based on the evaluation, that the supporting surfacesare capable of supporting the loads to be imposed. (ii) Counterweights shall be made of non-flowable solid material. (iii) Counterweights shall be secured by mechanical means to the outriggerbeams. (iv) Counterweights shall be removed from a scaffold until the scaffoldis disassembled. (v) Outrigger beams shall be secured by tiebacks equivalent in strengthto the suspension ropes. (vi) Tiebacks shall be secured to a structurally sound portion of the vessel,vessel section, building, or structure. (vii) Tiebacks shall be installed parallel to the centerline of the beam.(19) Suspension scaffold outrigger beams shall be: (i) Provided with stop bolts or shackles at both ends; (ii) Securely fastened together with the flanges turned out when channeliron beams are used in place of I-beams; (iii) Installed with all bearing supports perpendicular to the beam centerline; (iv) Set and maintained with the web in a vertical position; and (v) Where a single outrigger beam is used, the steel shackles or cleviceswith which the wire ropes are attached to the outrigger beams, shall beplaced directly over the hoisting machines. (20) Suspension scafford support devices such as cornice hooks, roof hooks,roof irons, parapet clamps, or similar devices shall be: (i) Made of mild steel, wrought iron, or materials of equivalent strength;(ii) Supported by bearing blocks; and (iii) Secured against movement by tiebacks installed at right angles tothe face of the building, structure, vessel, or vessel section, wheneverpossible, and secured to a structurally sound portion of the building,structure, vessel, or vessel section. (iv) Tiebacks shall be equivalent in strength to the hoisting rope. (21) When winding drum hoists are used on a suspension scaffold, they shallcontain not less than four wraps of the suspension rope at the lowest pointof scaffold travel. When other types of hoists are used, the suspensionropes shall be of such length that the scaffold can be lowered to the levelbelow without the rope end passing through the hoist, or the rope end shallbe configured or provided with means to prevent the end from passing throughthe hoist. (22) The use of repaired wire rope as suspension rope is prohibited. (23) Wire suspension ropes shall not be joined together except by eyesplicingwith shackles or coverplates and bolts. (24) The load end of wire suspension ropes shall be equipped with propersize thimbles and secured by eyesplicing or equivalent means. (25) Defective or damaged ropes shall not be used as suspension ropes ordrop lines. (26) Swaged attachments or spliced eyes on wire suspension ropes shallnot be used unless they are made by the wire rope manufacturer or a qualifiedperson. (27) When wire rope clips are used on suspension scaffolds, they shallbe retightened after initial loading and shall be inspected and retightenedperiodically thereafter. (28) Suspension scaffold mechanically-powered hoists and manually-poweredhoists shall be of a type tested and listed by a nationally recognizedtesting laboratory. (29) Gasoline-powered hoists shall not be used on suspension scaffolds.(30) Gears and brakes of mechanically-power-operated hoists used on suspensionscaffolds shall be enclosed. (31) In addition to the normal operating brake, suspension scaffold hoistsshall have a braking device or locking pawl which engages automaticallywhen the normal speed of descent of the hoist is exceeded. (32) Manually-powered hoists shall not be capable of lowering scaffoldplatforms without a positive crank force. (c) <T3>Access. </T3>This paragraph (c) does not apply to employees performingscaffold erection and dismantling operations.(1) Access to and between scaffold platforms more than two feet (0.6 m)above or below the point of access shall be by portable ladders, hook-onladders, attachable ladders, Jacob's ladders, stairway-type ladders (suchas ladder stands), ramps, gangways, runways, integral prefabricated scaffordrungs, or equivalent means, or by direct access from another scaffold,structure, personnel hoist, or similar surface. Crossbraces shall not beused as a means of access.(2) Portable, hook-on, attachable ladders:(Additional requirements for the proper construction and use of portableladders are contained in 29 CFR Part 1915, Subpart E_Access and Egress.)(i) Portable, hook-on, and attachable ladders shall be positioned so asnot to tip the scaffold;(ii) Portable, hook-on, and attachable ladders shall be positioned suchthat employees do not have to step more than one foot (31 cm) from theladder to any intermediate landing or platform.(iii) Hook-on and attachable ladders shall be positioned such that theirbottom rung is not more than 24 inches (61 cm) above the scaffold supportinglevel;(iv) Hook-on and attachable ladders shall be provided with rest platformsat 20 foot (6.0 m) maximum vertical intervals;(v) Hook-on and attachable ladders shall be specifically designed for usewith the manufactured types of scaffolds to be used;(vi) Hook-on and attachable ladders shall have a minimum rung length of11\1/2\ inches (29 cm); and(vii) Hook-on and attachable ladders shall have a maximum spacing betweenrungs of 12 inches (30 cm).(3) Stairway-type ladders shall:(i) Be positioned such that their bottom step is not more than 24 inches(61 cm) above the scaffold supporting level;(ii) Be provided with rest platforms at 12 foot (3.7 m) maximum verticalintervals;(iii) Have a minimum step length of 16 inches (41 cm);(iv) Have slip-resistant treads on all steps and landings; and(v) Have stairrails and handrails which meet the requirements of andSection;1915.85(c).(4) Ramps, runways, and gangways shall have guardrails which meet the requirementsof andSection;1915.203.(5) Integral prefabricated scaffold rungs shall:(i) Be specifically designed and constructed for use as ladder rungs;(ii) Have a minimum rung length of 11\1/2\ inches (29 cm);(iii) Be uniformly spaced within each frame section;(iv) Be provided with rest platforms at 20 foot (6.0 m) maximum verticalintervals; and(v) Have a maximum spacing between rungs of 16\1/2\ inches (42 cm), however,non-uniform rung spacing caused by joining end frames together is allowed,provided the resulting spacing does not exceed 16\1/2\ inches (42 cm).(6) All steps and rungs shall line up vertically with each other betweenrest platforms.(7) Direct access to or from another surface shall be used only when thescaffold is not more than 14 inches (36 cm) horizontally and not more than24 inches (61 cm) vertically from the other surface.(d) <T3>Use. </T3>(1) Scaffolds and scaffold components shall not be loadedin excess of their maximum intended loads or rated capacities.(2) The use of shore or lean-to scaffolds is prohibited.(3) Supported scaffolds and scaffold components shall be inspected forvisible defects periodically and after any occurrence which could affecta scaffold's structural integrity. Suspension scaffolds and scaffold componentsshall be inspected for visible defects immediately after installation priorto their first use; periodically thereafter (preferably before each use);and after any occurrence which could affect a scaffold's structural integrity.(4) Any part of a scaffold damaged or weakened such that a capable persondetermines its strength is reduced to less than that required by andSection;1915.252(a)(1) shall be immediately braced to meet that provision, or beremoved from service until repaired.(5) Scaffolds shall not be moved while employees are on them, except thatmobile scaffolds may be moved if the provisions of andSection; 1915.253(s)are followed.(6) Scaffolds shall not be erected, used, or moved closer to exposed andenergized power lines than as follows:(i) For all lines of more than 50 kv, minimum clearance between the linesand all parts of the scaffold shall be 10 feet (3.1 m) plus 0.4 inch (1cm) for each 1 kv over 50 kv, or twice the length of the line insulator,whichever is less, but never less than 10 feet (3.1 m);(ii) For all insulated lines between 300 volts and 50 kv, the minimum clearancebetween the lines and all parts of the scaffold shall be 10 feet (3.1 m);(iii) For all insulated lines of less than 300 volts, the minimum clearancebetween the lines and all parts of the scaffold shall be two feet (0.6m);(iv) For all lines of any voltage which are uninsulated, the minimum clearancebetween the lines and all parts of the scaffold shall be: 10 feet (3.1m) for lines of 50 kv and less; and for lines more than 50 kv, 10 feet(3.1 m) plus 0.4 inch (1 cm) for each 1 kv over 50 kv, or twice the lengthof the line insulator, whichever is less, but never less than 10 feet (3.1m).(7) Scaffolds shall not be erected, moved, dismantled, or altered exceptunder the supervision of a capable person.(8) Employees shall be prohibited from working on scaffolds covered withsnow, ice, or other slippery material except as necessary for removal ofsuch material.(9) Where swinging loads are being hoisted onto or near scaffolds suchthat loads could contact the scaffold, tag lines or equivalent measuresto stabilize the loads shall be utilized.(10) Suspension ropes shall be shielded when a heat-producing process isperformed. When acids or other corrosive substances are used on a scaffold,the ropes shall be shielded, treated to protect against the corrosive substances,or shall be of a material which is not adversely affected by the substancebeing used.(11) Work on or from scaffolds is prohibited during storms or when windspeeds at the level of work exceed 40 mph (64 km/hour), unless employeesare protected by a body belt/harness system or wind screen. Wind screensshall not be used unless the scaffold is secured against the forces imposed.(12) Debris shall not be allowed to accumulate on platforms.(13) Ladders and makeshift devices shall not be used on top of scaffoldplatforms to increase the working level height of employees.(14) Platform units shall not deflect more than 1/60 of the span when loaded.(e) <T3>Fall protection. </T3>(1) Employees (except those erecting or dismantlingscaffolds) shall be protected from falling to lower levels by the use ofbody belt/harness systems or Type I guardrail systems, in the followingcircumstances: when they are on scaffolds which are above water; when theyare on scaffolds which are on vessels or vessel sections, and more thanfive feet (1.5 m) above lower levels; when they are on scaffolds whichare located immediately adjacent to vessels, and more than five feet (1.5m) above lower levels; and when they are on scaffolds which are locatedin any other area and more than 10 feet (3.1 m) above lower levels, exceptlevels as follows: (i) Employees on boatswains' chairs, catenary scaffolds, float scaffolds,needle beam scaffolds, and ladder jack scaffolds shall be protected bybody belt/harness systems;(ii) Employees on single-point adjustable suspension scaffolds and on two-pointadjustable suspension scaffolds shall be protected by body belt/harnesssystems and Type I or Type II guardrail systems;(iii) Employees on crawling boards (chicken ladders) shall be protectedby body belt/harness systems, Type I guardrail systems, or by a three-fourthinch diameter grabline or equivalent handhold securely fastened besideeach crawling board;(iv) Employees on self-contained adjustable scaffolds shall be protectedby Type I guardrail systems when the platform is supported by the framestructure, and by body belt/harness systems and Type I guardrail systemswhen the platform is supported by ropes;(v) Employees on walkways located within a scaffold shall be protectedby a Type I guardrail system installed within eight inches of and alongat least one side of the walkway.(vi) Guardrail systems required by the above provisions may have railsomitted where the vessel, vessel section, building, or structure preventstheir use. However, when rails are omitted, employees working above lowerlevels, shall be protected by body belt/harness systems, and employeesworking over water shall be protected by body belt/harness systems andpersonal flotation devices.(2) Employees on suspended scaffolds which are attached to a vessel andtriced out of a vertical line below the scaffold supports, and employeeson scaffolds which are on floats subject to surging, shall be protectedagainst falling toward the vessel by a Type I guardrail system attachedon the vessel side of the platform, or they shall be protected by a bodybelt/harness system attached to a Type I guardrail system installed alongthe side of the platform which is away from the vessel.(3) Body belt/harnesses shall be attached by lanyard to a dropline, trolleyline, or scaffold structural member. However, when overhead obstructionssuch as overhead protection or additional platform levels are part of asingle-point or two-point adjustable suspension scaffold, then droplinesshall not be used.(i) Droplines, when used, shall be fastened to a fixed safe point of anchorage,shall be independent of the scaffold, and shall be protected from sharpedges and abrasion.(ii) Trolley lines, when used, shall be secured to two or more structuralmembers of the scaffold, and shall not be attached to the suspension ropes.(iii) When lanyards are connected to trolley lines or structural memberson a single-point or two-point adjustable suspension scaffold, the scaffoldshall be equipped with additional independent support lines and automaticlocking devices capable of stopping the fall of the scaffold in the eventone or both of the suspension ropes fail. The independent support linesshall be equal in number and strength to the suspension ropes.(iv) Droplines, independent support lines, and suspension ropes shall notbe attached to each other, nor shall they be attached to or use the samepoint of anchorage. Safe points of anchorage include structural membersof vessels, vessel sections, buildings, and structures, but do not includestandpipes, vents, other piping systems, electrical conduit, outriggerbeams, nor counterweights.(4) Guardrail systems installed to meet the requirements of this sectionshall comply with the following provisions:(i) Guardrail systems shall be installed along all open sides and endsof platforms. See paragraph (e)(2) of this section for protection alongthe vessel side of scaffolds.(ii) The top edge height of toprails or equivalent member shall be installedbetween 38 inches (1.0 m) and 45 inches (1.2 m) above the platform surfacefor Type I guardrail systems, and between 36 inches (0.9 m) and 45 inches(1.2 m) above the platform surface for Type II guardrail systems.(iii) Midrails, screens, mesh, intermediate vertical members, solid panels,or equivalent structural members shall be installed between the top edgeof the guardrail system and the scaffold platform.(iv) Midrails, when used, shall be installed at a height midway betweenthe top edge of the guardrail system and the platform surface. (v) Screens and mesh, when used, shall extend from the top edge of theguardrail system to the scaffold platform, and along the entire openingbetween the supports.(vi) Intermediate vertical members (such as balusters), when used, shallbe not more than 19 inches (48 cm) apart.(vii) Toprails or equivalent members shall be capable of withstanding,without failure, a force applied in any downward or horizontal directionat any point along their top edge of at least 200 pounds (890 n) for TypeI guardrail systems, and at least 100 pounds (445 n) for Type II guardrailsystems.(viii) When the loads specified in paragraph (e)(4)(vii) of this sectionare applied in a downward direction, the top edge shall not deflect toa height less than 38 inches (1.0 m) above the platform surface for TypeI guardrail systems, and 36 inches (0.9 m) for Type II guardrail systems.(ix) Midrails, screens, mesh, intermediate vertical members, solid panels,and equivalent structural members shall be capable of withstanding, withoutfailure, a force applied in any downward or horizontal direction at anypoint along the midrail, or other member, of at least 150 pounds (666 n)for Type I guardrail systems, and at least 75 pounds (333 n) for Type IIguardrail systems.(x) Suspension scaffold hoists and non-walk through stirrups are acceptableas end guardrails, provided that the space between the hoist or stirrupand the side guardrail or structure does not allow passage of employeesto the end of the scaffold.(xi) Toprails and midrails shall be so surfaced as to prevent injury toan employee from punctures or lacerations, and to prevent snagging of clothingwhich could cause an employee to fall.(xii) The ends of all rails shall not overhang the terminal posts exceptwhere such overhang does not constitute a projection hazard to employees.(xiii) Steel or plastic banding shall not be used as a toprail or midrail.(f) <T3>Falling object protection. </T3>(1) In addition to wearing hardhats,employees on scaffolds shall be protected as necessary from falling objectsby toeboards, screens, or guardrail systems erected to prevent objectsfrom falling from higher levels, or they shall be protected by a canopystructure erected to deflect falling objects. The criteria for fallingobject protection are set forth in andSection; 1915.203(d).(2) Canopies, when used, shall be installed between the falling objecthazard and the employees.(3) When canopies are used on suspension scaffolds, the scaffolds shallbe equipped with additional independent support lines equal in number tothe number of points supported, and equivalent in strengh to the suspensionropes.(4) Independent support lines and suspension ropes used on scaffolds withoverhead protection shall not be attached to the same points of anchorage.(5) When necessary, to prevent tools and materials from falling on employeesbelow, toeboards shall be installed on all scaffolds which are on or immediatelyadjacent to vessels or vessel sections. The criteria for toeboards is setforth in andSection; 1915.203(d)(6) Except as provided in paragraph (f)(5) of this section, toeboards shallbe installed on all open sides and edges of scaffold platforms which aremore than 10 feet above lower levels except those which are wholly withinthe interior of a building and covering the entire floor area of any roomtherein and not having any side exposed to a hoistway, elevator shaft,stairwell, or other floor opening. The criteria for toeboards is set forthin andSection; 1915.203(d).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.253</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional requirements applicable to specific types of scaffolds.</ITAG>The following requirements apply to the specific types of scaffolds asindicated, in addition to the general requirements of andSection; 1915.252.(a) <T3>Pole scaffolds. </T3>(1) When platforms are being moved to the nextlevel, the existing platform and ledgers shall be left undisturbed untilthe new bearers have been set in place and braced prior to receiving thenew platform units.(2) Crossbracing shall be installed between the inner and outer sets ofpoles on double pole scaffolds.(3) Diagonal bracing in both directions shall be installed across the entireinside face of double pole scaffolds.(4) Diagonal bracing in both directions shall be installed across the entireoutside face of all double- and single-pole scaffolds.(5) Ledgers and bearers shall be installed on edge.(6) Bearers shall extend a minimum of three inches (7.6 cm) over the outsideedges of ledgers.(7) Ledgers shall extend over a minimum of two poles, and shall be supportedby bearing blocks securely attached to the poles.(8) Braces, bearers, and ledgers shall not be spliced between poles.(9) Where wood poles are spliced, the ends shall be squared and the uppersection shall rest squarely on the lower section. Wood splice plates shallbe provided on at least two adjacent sides and shall be not less than fourfeet (1.2 m) in length, overlap and abutted ends equally, and have at leastthe same cross-sectional areas as the pole. Splice plates of other materialsof equivalent strength may be used.(10) Scaffolds and scaffold components shall either be built and loadedin accordance with Appendix A, or shall be designed by a registered professionalengineer and shall be constructed and loaded in accordance with such design.(11) Wood pole scaffolds shall not be erected beyond the reach of firefightingequipment.(b) <T3>Tube and coupler scaffolds. </T3>(1) When platforms are being movedto the next level, the existing platform shall be left undisturbed untilthe new bearers have been set in place and braced prior to receiving thenew platform units.(2) Transverse bracing across the width of the scaffold shall be installedat the scaffold ends and at least at every third set of posts. Such bracingshall be installed for each section of six levels between the fourth andsixth levels, and shall extend diagonally from the inner or outer postsor runners at the bottom of the fourth level, upward to the inner or outerposts or runners at the bottom of the fifth level, and similarly to thesixth level.(3) Longitudinal bracing across the inner and outer rows of posts shallbe installed diagonally in both directions, and shall extend from the baseof the end posts upward to the top of the scaffold at approximately a 45-degreeangle. On scaffolds whose length is greater than their height, such bracingshall be repeated beginning at least at every fifth post. On scaffoldswhose length is shorter than their height, such bracing shall be installedfrom the base of the end posts upward to the opposite end posts, and thenin alternating directions until reaching the top of the scaffold.(4) Where conditions preclude the attachment of bracing to posts, bracingshall be attached to the runners.(5) Bearers shall be installed transversely between each set of posts,at each level, and at each intermediate level where platforms are installed.(6) Bearers, when coupled to posts, shall have the inboard coupler beardirectly on the runner coupler. When the bearers are coupled to runners,the couplers shall be as close to the post as possible.(7) Bearers shall extend beyond the posts and runners, and shall providefull contact with the coupler.(8) Runners shall be installed along the length of the scaffold, locatedon both the inside and outside posts at level heights (when tube and couplerguardrails and midrails are used on outside posts they may be used in lieuof outside runners).(9) Runners shall be interlocked on straight runs to form continuous lengthsand shall be coupled to each post. The bottom runners shall be locatedas close to the base as possible.(10) Couplers shall be of a structural metal, such as a drop-forged steel,malleable iron, or structural grade aluminum. The use of gray cast ironis prohibited.(11) Scaffolds and scaffold components shall either be built and loadedin accordance with Appendix A, or shall be designed by a registered professionalengineer and shall be constructed and loaded in accordance with such design.(c) <T3>Fabricated frame scaffolds</T3>. (1) When moving platforms to the nextlevel, the existing platform shall be left undisturbed until the new frameshave been set in place and braced prior to receiving the new platform units.(2) Frames and panels shall be braced by cross, horizontal, or diagonalbraces, or combination thereof, to secure vertical members together laterally.The cross braces shall be of such length as will automatically square andalign vertical members so that the erected scaffold is always plumb, level,and square. All brace connections shall be made secure.(3) Frames and panels shall be joined together vertically by coupling orstacking pins or equivalent means.(4) Where uplift can occur which would displace scaffold end frames orpanels, the frames or panels shall be locked together vertically by pinsor equivalent means.(5) Brackets used to support cantilevered loads shall be seated with side-bracketsparallel to the frames, and end-brackets at 90 degrees to the frames. Bracketsshall not be bent or twisted from these positions.(6) Scaffolds over 125 feet (38.0 m) in height above their base platesshall be designed by a registered professional engineer and shall be constructedand loaded in accordance with such design.(d) <T3>Horse scaffolds</T3>. (1) Scaffolds shall not be constructed or arrangedmore than two tiers or 10 feet (3.0 m) in height, whichever is less.(2) When arranged in tiers, each horse shall be placed directly over thehorse in the tier below.(3) When arranged in tiers, the legs of each horse shall be nailed downor otherwise secured to prevent displacement. (4) When arranged in tiers, each tier shall be crossbraced.(e) <T3>Bracket scaffolds</T3>. (1) Each bracket shall be attached to the supportingvessel, vessel section, building, or structure by means of one or moreof the following: nails; a metal stud attachment device; welding; hookingover a secured structural supporting member, or by a bolt extending throughto the opposite side of the supporting wall.(2) Folding type metal brackets, when extended for use, shall be eitherbolted or secured with a locking-type pin.(f) <T3>Outrigger scaffolds</T3>. (1) The inboard end of outrigger beams, measuredfrom the fulcrum point to the extreme point of anchorage, shall be notless than one and one-half times the outboard end in length.(2) Outrigger beams shall rest on edge, the sides shall be plumb, and theedges shall be horizontal.(3) The fulcrum point of outrigger beams shall rest on secure bearingsat least six inches (15.2 cm) in each horizontal dimension.(4) Outrigger beams shall be secured in place against movement and shallbe securly braced at the fulcrum point against tipping.(5) The inboard ends of outrigger beams shall be securely anchored eitherby means of braced struts bearing against sills in contact with the overheador ceiling beams, or by means of tension members secured to the floor joistsor deck underfoot, or by both.(6) The entire supporting structure shall be securely braced to preventany horizontal movement.(7) To prevent displacement, platform units shall be nailed, bolted, orotherwise secured to outriggers.(8) Scaffolds and scaffold components shall either be built and loadedin accordance with Appendix A, or shall be designed by a registered professionalengineer and shall be constructed and loaded in accordance with such design.(g) <T3>Ladder jack scaffolds</T3>. (1) Platforms shall not exceed a heightof 20 feet (6.1 m).(2) All ladders used to support ladder jack scaffolds shall meet the requirementsof andSection; 1915.86, except that job-made ladders shall not be used tosupport ladder jack scaffolds.(3) The ladder jack shall be so designed and constructed that it will beareither on the side rails and ladder rungs or on the ladder rungs alone.If bearing on rungs only, the bearing area shall be at least 10 inches(25.4 cm) on each rung.(4) Ladders used to support ladder jacks shall be placed, fastened, orequipped with devices to prevent slipping.(5) Scaffold platforms shall not be bridged one to another.(h) <T3>Window jack scaffolds</T3>. (1) Scaffolds shall be securely attachedto the window opening.(2) Scaffolds shall be used only for the purpose of working at the windowopening through which the jack is placed.(3) Window jacks shall not be used to support planks placed between onewindow jack and another, or for other elements of scaffolding.(i) <T3>Crawling boards (chicken ladders)</T3>. (1) Crawling boards shall extendfrom the roof peak to the eaves when used for maintenance.(2) Crawling boards shall be secured to the roof by ridge hooks or equivalentmeans.(j) <T3>Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffolds</T3>. (1) Scaffold platformsshall not be placed any higher than the second highest rung or step ofthe ladder supporting the platform.(2) All ladders used in conjunction with step, platform and trestle ladderscaffolds shall meet the requirements of andSection; 1915.85, except thatjob-made ladders shall not be used to support such scaffolds.(3) Ladders used to support step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffoldsshall be placed, fastened, or equipped with devices to prevent slipping.(4) Scaffolds shall not be bridged one to another.(5) A spreader or locking device shall be used to hold the front and backsections in an open position, and to hold the extension section securelyin the elevated position. (k) <T3>Single-point adjustable suspension scaffolds. </T3>(1) When two single-pointadjustable suspension scaffolds are combined to form a two-point adjustablesuspension scaffold, the resulting scaffold shall meet the requirementsfor two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds. (2) Except as provided herein, the supporting rope shall be vertical betweenthe scaffold and the suspension device. The scaffold shall not be swayednor the rope fixed to any intermediate point(s) to change the directionof the rope. When the scaffold is on the outside of a dome-type of slantedstructure, intermediate supports may be used to change the direction ofthe rope from a verticle direction. Such supports shall be designed andinstalled to prevent chafing of the rope. (3) Boatswains' chairs tackle shall be correct size ball bearing or bushedblocks, and properly ``eye'' spliced minimum five-eighth (\5/8\) inch (1.6cm) diameter first grade manila rope, or equivalent. (4) Boatswains' chairs seat slings shall be reeved through four cornerholes in the seat; shall cross each other on the underside of the seat;and shall be rigged so as to prevent slippage which could cause an out-of-levelcondition. (5) Boatswains' chairs seat slings shall be a minimum of five-eighth (\5/8\)inch (1.6 cm) diameter fiber or synthetic rope or equivalent, except asprovided in paragraph (k)(6) below. (6) When a heat-producing process such as gas or arc welding is being conducted,boatswains' chairs seat slings shall be a minimum of three-eighth (\3/8\)inch (1.0 cm) wire rope. (7) Non-cross-laminated wood boatswains' chairs shall be reinforced ontheir underside by cleats securely fastened to prevent the board from splitting.(1) <T3>Two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds (swing stages). </T3>(1)Platforms shall not be more than 36 inches (0.9 m) wide unless designedby a qualified person to prevent unstable conditions. (2) The platform shall be securely fastened to hangers (stirrups) by U-boltsor equivalent means. (3) The blocks for fiber or synthetic ropes shall consist of at least onedouble and one single block. The sheaves of all blocks shall fit the sizeof the rope used. (4) Platforms shall be ladder-type, plank-type, or beam-type. (5) Scaffolds shall be tied or otherwise secured to prevent them from swaying.Window cleaners' anchors shall not be used for this purpose. (6) Two-point scaffolds designed for use as two-point scaffolds shall notbe bridged or otherwise connected one to another during raising and loweringoperations. Two-point scaffolds designed for use in multi-point scaffoldsmay be bridged one to another if the bridge connections are articulated,and the hoists properly sized. (7) Passage may be made from one platform to another only when the platformsare at the same height, are abutting closely, and walk-through stirrupsspecifically designed for this purpose are used. (m) <T3>Multi-point adjustable suspension scaffolds. </T3>(1) When two or morescaffolds are used they shall not be bridged one to another unless theyare designed to be bridged, the bridge connections are articulated, andthe hoists are properly sized. (2) If bridges are not used, passage may be made from one platform to anotheronly when the platforms are at the same height and are abutting closely.(3) Scaffolds shall be suspended from metal outriggers, iron brackets,wire rope slings, iron hooks, or equivalent means. (n) <T3>Catenary scaffolds. </T3>(1) No more than one platform shall be placedbetween consecutive veritical pickups, and no more than two platforms shallbe used on a catenary scaffold. (2) Platforms supported by wire ropes shall have hook-shaped stops on eachend of the platforms to prevent them from slipping off the wire ropes.These hooks shall be so placed that they will prevent the platform fromfalling if one of the horizontal wire ropes breaks. (3) Wire ropes shall not be tightened to the extent that the applicationof a scaffold load will overstress them. (4) Wire ropes shall be continuous and without splices between anchors.(o) <T3>Float (ship) scaffolds. </T3>(1) The platform shall be supported bya minimum of two bearers, each of which shall project a minimum of sixinches (15.2 cm) beyond the platform on both sides. Each bearer shall besecurely fastened to the platform. (2) Rope connections shall be such that the platform cannot shift or slip.(3) When only two ropes are used with each float: (i) They shall be arranged so as to provide four ends which are to be securelyfastened to overhead supports. (ii) Each supporting rope shall be hitched around one end of the bearerand pass under the platform to the other end of the bearer where it ishitched again, leaving sufficient rope at each end for the supporting ties.(p) <T3>Interior hung scaffolds. </T3>(1) Scaffolds shall be suspended onlyfrom the roof structure, or other structural members such as a ship's overhead,or a building's ceiling beams.(2) Overhead supporting members (overhead, roof structure, ceiling beams,or other structural members) shall be inspected and checked for strengthbefore the scaffold is erected. (3) Suspension ropes and cable shall be connected to the overhead supportingmembers by shackles, clips, thimbles, or equivalent means. (q) <T3>Needle beam scaffolds. </T3>(1) Scaffold support beams shall be installedon edge. (2) Ropes or hangers shall be used for supports, except that one end ofa needle beam scaffold may be supported by a permanent structural member.(3) The ropes shall be securely attached to the needle beams. (4) The support connection shall be arranged so as to prevent the needlebeam from rolling or otherwise becoming displaced. (5) Platform units shall be securely attached to the needle beams by boltsor equivalent means. Cleats and overhang are not considered to be adequatemeans of attachment. (r) <T3>Multi-level suspended scaffolds. </T3>(1) Scaffolds shall be equippedwith additional independent support lines, equal in number to the numberof points supported, and equivalent in strength to the strength of thesuspension ropes, and rigged to support the scaffold in the event the suspensionrope(s) fail. (2) Independent support lines and suspension ropes shall not be attachedto the same points of anchorage. (3) Supports for platforms shall be attached directly to the support stirrupand not to any other platform. (s) <T3>Mobile scaffolds. </T3>(1) Scaffolds shall be braced by cross, horizontal,or diagonal braces, or combination thereof, to prevent collapse of thescaffold and to secure vertical members together laterally so as to automaticallysquare and align the vertical members. Scaffolds shall be plumb, level,and squared. All brace connections shall be secured. (i) Scaffolds constructed of tube and coupler components shall also conformto the requirements of andSection;1915.253(b); (ii) Scaffolds constructed of fabricated frame components shall also conformto the requirements of andSection;1915.253(c). (2) Scaffold casters and wheels shall be locked with positive wheel and/orwheel and swivel locks, or equivalent means, to prevent movement of thescaffold while the scaffold is used in a stationary manner. (3) The force used to move the scaffold shall be applied as close to thebase as practicable, but not more than five feet (1.5 m) above the supportingsurface. (4) Power systems used to propel mobile scaffolds shall be designed forsuch use. Forklifts, trucks, or similar motor vehicles shall not be usedto propel scaffolds unless the scaffold is designed for such propulsionsystems. (5) Scaffolds shall be stabilized to prevent tipping during movement. (6) Employees shall not be allowed to ride on scaffolds unless the followingconditions exist: (i) The surface on which the scaffold is being moved shall be within threedegrees of level, and free of pits, holes, and obstructions; (ii) The maximum height to base width ratio of the scaffold during movementshall be two to one or less. Outrigger frames may be included as part ofthe base width dimension; (iii) Outrigger frames, when used, shall be installed on both sides ofthe scaffold; (iv) When power systems are used, the propelling force shall be applieddirectly to the wheels, and shall not produce a speed in excess of oneand one-fourth mph (2.0 kph), and (v) The employees are not on any part of the scaffold which extends outwardbeyond the wheels, casters, or other supports. (7) Platforms shall not extend outward past the base supports of the scaffoldunless outrigger frames or equivalent devices are used to ensure stability.(8) Where leveling of the scaffold is necessary, screw jacks or equivalentmeans shall be used. (9) Caster stems and wheel stems shall be pinned or otherwise secured inscaffold legs. (t) <T3>Crane or derrick suspended personnel platforms. </T3>(1) Lifting bridleson platforms suspended from cranes or derricks shall consist of four legsso attached that the stability of the platform is assured. (2) Unless the crane or derrick hook has a safety latch or is moused, thelifting bridles on platforms suspended from cranes or derricks shall beattached by shackles to the lower lifting block or other positive meansshall be taken to prevent them from becoming accidentally disengaged fromthe hook.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Subpart N_Scaffold Specifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Appendix serves as a non-mandatory guideline to assist employersin complying with the requirements of Subpart N. An employer may use thoseguidelines and tables as a starting point for designing scaffold systems.However, the guidelines and tables do not provide all the information necessaryto build a complete system, and the employer is still responsible for designingand assembling these components in such a way that the completed systemwill meet the requirements of paragraph andSection; 1915.252(a). Scaffoldcomponents which are not designed and loaded in accordance with this Appendix,and components for which no specific guidelines or tables are given inthe following Appendix (e.g., joints, ties, components for wood pole scaffoldsmore than 60 feet in height, components for heavy-duty horse scaffolds,components made with other materials, components with other dimensions,etc.), must be designed and constructed in accordance with the capacityrequirements of paragraph andSection; 1915.252(a), and loaded in accordancewith paragraph andSection; 1915.252(d)(1). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Index to Appendix A for Subpart N </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">1. </ITAG><T3>General Guidelines and Tables </T3><ITAG tagnum="71">2. Specific Guidelines and Tables </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(a) Pole scaffolds: Single pole woodfolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(i) Crawling boards (chicken ladders) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(j) Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(k) Single-point adjustable suspension scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(l) Two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(m) Multi-point adjustable suspension scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(n) Catenary scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(o) Float (ship) scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(p) Interior hung scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">(q) Needle beam scaffolds </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>General guidelines and tables. </T3>(a) The following tables, and thetables in Part B_Specific guidelines and tables, are based on all load-carryingtimber members of the scaffold being a minimum of 1,500 psi fiber stressin bending (stress grade) construction grade lumber. All dimensions arenominal sizes as provided in the American Softwood Lumber Standards, datedJanuary 1970, except that where rough sizes are noted, only rough or undressedlumber of the size specified will satisfy minimum requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) All wood planking shall be selected for scaffold plank use asrecognized by grading rules established by a recognized independent inspectionagency for the species of wood used. The maximum permissible spans for2 x 10 inch (nominal) or 2 x 9 inch (rough) solid sawn wood planks shallbe as shown in the following Table A-1: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,10,10</C><T4>Table A-1 </T4><H1>Maximum intended load (lb/ft</H1> 2) <H1>Maximum permissible span using full thickness undressed lumber (ft)</H1><H1>Maximum permissible span using nominal thickness lumber (ft) </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">25<D>10</D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">50<D>8</D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75<D>6</D><D/></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">The maximum permissible span for 1\1/4\ x 9-inch or wider wood plankof full thickness with a maximum intended load of 50 lb/ft \2\ shall befour feet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Fabricated planks and platforms may be used in lieu of solid sawnwood planks. Maximum spans for such units shall be as recommended by themanufacturer based on the maximum intended load being calculated as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,xs60,r50</C>  <H1>Rated load capacity </H1><H1>Intended load </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Light-duty<D>andbullet; 25 pounds per square foot applied uniformly over the entirespan area.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medium-duty<D>andbullet; 50 pounds per square foot applied uniformly over the entirespan area. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Heavy-duty<D>andbullet; 75 pounds per square foot applied uniformly over the entirespan area.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">One-person<D>andbullet; 250 pounds placed at the center of the span (total 250 pounds).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Two-person<D>andbullet; 250 pounds placed 18 inches to the left and right of the centerof the span (total 500 pounds). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Three-person<D>andbullet; 250 pounds placed at the center of the span and 250 poundsplaced 18 inches to the left and right of the center of the span (total750 pounds). </D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Platform units used to make scaffold platforms intendedfor light-duty use shall be capable of supporting at least 25 pounds persquare foot applied uniformly over the entire unit-span area, or a 250-poundpoint load placed on the unit at the center of the span, whichever loadproduces the greater shear force. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Guardrails shall be as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Toprails shall be equivalent in strength to 2 inch by 4 inch lumber;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1\1/4\ inch x \1/8\ inch structural angle iron; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1 inch x .070 inch wall steel tubing; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.990 inch x .058 inch wall aluminum tubing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Midrails shall be equivalent in strength to 1 inch by 6 inchlumber; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1\1/4\ inch x 1\1/4\ inch x \1/8\ inch structural angle iron; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1 inch x. .070 inch wall steel tubing; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.990 inch x. .058 inch wall aluminum tubing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Toeboards shall be equivalent in strength to 1 inch by 4 inchlumber; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1\1/4\ inch x 1\1/4\ inch structural angle iron; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1 inch x .070 inch wall steel tubing; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.990 inch x .058 inch wall aluminum tubing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Posts shall be equivalent in strength to 2 inch by 4 inch lumber;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1-\1/4\ inch x 1-\1/4\ inch x \1/8\ inch structural angle iron; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1 inch x .070 inch wall steel tubing; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.990 inch x .058 inch wall aluminum tubing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Distance between posts shall not exceed 8 feet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Overhead protection shall consist of 2 inch nominal planking laidtight, or \3/4\-inch plywood. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Screen installed between toeboards and midrails or toprails shallconsist of No. 18 gauge U.S. Standard wire one inch mesh. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Specific guidelines and tables_</T3>(a) <T3>Pole scaffolds. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table A-2._Minimum dimensions For Single Pole Wood Pole Scaffolds </T4><H1> </H1><H1>Light duty up to 20 ft high </H1><H1>Light duty up to 60 ft high </H1><H1>Medium duty up to 60 ft high </H1><H1>Heavy duty up to 60 ft high</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load <D>25 lbs/ft\2\ </D><D>25 lbs/ft\2\ </D><D>50 lbs/ft\2\ </D><D>75 lbs/ft\2\. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Poles or uprights <D>2andmultiply;4 in </D><D>4andmultiply;4 in </D><D>4andmultiply;4 in </D><D>4 andmultiply; 6 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum pole spacing (longitudinal) <D>6 ft </D><D>10 ft </D><D>8 ft </D><D>6 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum pole spacing (transverse) <D>5 ft </D><D>5 ft </D><D>5 ft </D><D>5 ft. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ledgers (transverse) <D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1\1/4\andmultiply;9 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in. </D></ITAG>Bearers and maximum spacing of bearers: <ITAG tagnum="1">3 ft <D>2andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;5 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 ft <D>2andmultiply;6 in or 3andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;6 in or 3andmultiply;4 in (rough) </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;5 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6 ft <D> </D><D> </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;5 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8 ft <D> </D><D> </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in or 3andmultiply;4 in </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Planking <D>1\1/4\andmultiply;9 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 in </D><D>2andmultiply;10 n. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum vertical spacing of horizontal members <D>7 ft </D><D>9 ft </D><D>7 ft </D><D>6 ft 6 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bracing-horizontal <D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;6 in or 1\1/4\andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;4 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bracing-diagonal <D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>2andmultiply;4 in. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tie-ins <D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in </D><D>1andmultiply;4 in.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_All members except planking are used on edge. All wood bearersshall be reinforced with 3/16andmultiply;2 in steel strip, or the equivalent,secured to the lower edges for the entire length of the bearer.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>A-3._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Independent Wood Pole Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Light duty up to 20 ft high</H1><H1>Light duty up ot 60 ft high</H1><H1>Medium duty up to 60 ft high</H1><H1>Heavy duty up to 60 ft high</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load<D>25 lbs/ft\2\</D><D>25 lbs/ft\2\</D><D>50 lbs/ft\2\</D><D>75 lbs/ft\2\.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Poles or uprights<D>2 x 4 in</D><D>4 x 4 in</D><D>4 x 4 in</D><D>4 x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum pole spacing (longitudinal)<D>6 ft</D><D>10 ft </D><D>8 ft</D><D>6 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum (transverse)<D>6 ft</D><D>10 ft</D><D>8 ft</D><D>8 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ledgers<D>1\1/4\ x 4 in</D><D>1\1/4\ x 9 in</D><D>2 x 10 in </D><D>2 x 10 in.</D></ITAG>Bearers and maximum spacing of bearers:<ITAG tagnum="3">3 ft</ITAG><D>2 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 10 in</D><D>2 x 10 in (rough).</D><ITAG tagnum="3">6 ft</ITAG><D>2 x 6 in or 3 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 10 in (rough) or 3 x 8 in</D><D>2 x 10 in</D><D>2 x 10 in (rough).</D><ITAG tagnum="3">8 ft</ITAG><D>2 x 6 in or 3 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 10 in (rough) or 3 x 8 in</D><D>2 x 10 in</D><D/>_<ITAG tagnum="3">10 ft</ITAG><D>2 x 6 in or 3 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 10 in (rough) 3 x 3 in</D><D/>_<D/>_<ITAG tagnum="1">Planking<D>1\1/4\ x 9 in</D><D>2 x 10 in</D><D>2 x 10 in</D><D>2 x 10 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum vertical spacing of horizontal members<D>7 ft</D><D>7 ft</D><D>6 ft</D><D>6 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bracing-horizontal<D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 6 in or 1\1/4\ x 4 in</D><D>2 x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bracing-diagonal<D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in</D><D>2 x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Die-ins<D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in</D><D>1 x 4 in.</D><F/><T2>Note.</T2>_All members except planking are used on edge. All wood bearersshall be reinforced with \3/16\ x 2 in steel strip, or the equivalent,secured to the lower edges for the entire length of the bearer.</ITAG></ITAG>(b) <T3>Tube and coupler scaffolds.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,i1,s100,r100,r100,r100</C><T4>Table </T4>A-4._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Tube and Coupler Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Light duty</H1><H1>Medium duty</H1><H1>Heavy duty</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load<D>25 lbs/ft</D><D>50 lbs/ft\2\</D><D>75 lbs/ft\2\.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Posts, runners and braces<D>Nominal 2 in (1.90 in) OD steel tube or pipe</D><D>Nominal 2 in (1.90 in) OD steel tube or pipe</D><D>Nominal 2 in (1.90 in) OD steel tube or pipe.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bearers <D>Nominal 2 in (1.90 in) OD steel tube or pipe and a maximum post spacingof 6 ft by 10 ft\1\</D><D>Nominal 2 in (1.90 in) OD steel tube or pipe and a maximum post spacingof 5 ft by 8 ft\1\</D><D>Nominal 2\1/2\ in (2.375 in) OD steel tube or pipe and a maximum postspacing of 6 ft by 6 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D/>or <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D>Nominal 2\1/2\ in (2.375 in) OD steel tube or pipe and a maximum postspacing of 6 ft by 8 ft\1\</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum runner spacing vertically<D>6 ft 6 in</D><D>6 ft 6 in</D><D>6 ft 6 in.</D><F>\1\Bearers shall be installed in the direction of the shorter dimension.</F><F/><T2>Note.</T2>_Longitudinal diagonal bracing shall be installed at an angleof 45anddegrees; (andplusmin; 5anddegrees;).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>A-5._<T4>Maximum Number of Planked Levels for Tube and Coupler Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Maximum number of additional planked levels</H1><H2>Light duty</H2><H2>Medium duty</H2><H2>Heavy duty</H2><H1>Maximum height of scaffold</H1>Number of Working Levels:<ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>16 </D><D>11 </D><D>6 </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>11 </D><D>1 </D><D>0 </D><D>125 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>6 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>1 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D> </D></ITAG></ITAG>(c) <T3>Fabricated frame scaffolds. </T3>Because of their prefabricated nature,no specific guidelines or tables are given.(d) <T3>Horse scaffolds.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,i1,s10,xs50</C><T4>Table </T4>A-6._<T4>Minimum Dimension for Horse Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load (light duty) <D>25 lb/ft\2\.\1\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load (medium duty) <D>50 lb/ft\2\.\1\</D></ITAG>Horizontal members or bearers:<ITAG tagnum="3">Light duty </ITAG><D>2 x 4 in.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Medium duty </ITAG><D>3 x 4 in.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Legs <D>2 x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Longitudinal brace between legs <D>1 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gusset brace at top of legs <D>1 x 8 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Half diagonal braces <D>2 x 4 in.</D><F>\1\Horses shall be spaced not more than eight feet apart for light dutyloads, and not more than five feet apart for medium duty loads.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(e) <T3>Bracket scaffolds. </T3>(1) Brackets shall consist of a triangular-shapedframe made of wood with a cross-section not less than 2 inches by 3 inches,or of 1\1/4\ inch x 1\1/4\ inch x \1/8\ inch structural angle iron.(2) Bolts used to attach brackets shall not be less than five-eighth inchin diameter.(3) Maximum bracket spacing shall be eight feet on centers.(4) No more than two employers shall occupy any given eight feet of a bracketscaffold at any one time. Tools and materials shall not exceed 75 poundsin addition to the occupancy.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,i1,s10,r10</C><T4>Table </T4>A-7._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Wooden Figure-four Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load <D>25 pounds/square foot.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Uprights <D>2 x 4 in. or 2 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bearers (two) <D>1 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Braces <D>1 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum length of bearers <D>3 x 6 in. (unsupported)</D></ITAG></ITAG>Outrigger bearers for wooden figure-four scaffolds shall consist of twopieces of 1 x 6 inch lumber nailed on opposite sides of the vertical support.Bearers for wooden figure-four scaffolds shall project not more than threefeet six inches from the outside of the support, and shall be braced andsecured to prevent tipping or turning. The knee or angle brace shall intersectthe bearer at least three feet from the form at an angle of approximately45 degrees, and the lower end shall be nailed to a vertical support.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>A-8._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Metal Bracket Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load <D>25 pounds/square foot.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Uprights <D>2 x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bearers <D>As designed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Braces <D>As designed.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,p8,7/8,i1,s25,r25</C><T4>Table </T4>A-9._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Wood Bracklet Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load <D>25 pounds/square foot.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Uprights <D>2 x 4 in or 2 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bearers <D>2 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum scaffold width <D>1 x 6 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Braces <D>1 x 6 in.</D></ITAG></ITAG>(f) <T3>Outrigger scaffolds (single level). </T3>Outrigger beams shall extendnot more than six feet beyond the face of the building. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,xs40,xs40</C><T4>Table </T4>A-10._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Outrigger Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Light duty</H1><H1>Medium duty </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load <D>25 lb/ft\2\ </D><D>50 lb/ft\2\.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outrigger size <D>2 x 10 in </D><D>3 x 10 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum outrigger spacing <D>10 ft</D><D>6 ft.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) <T3>Ladder jack scaffolds.</T3> Maximum intended load_25 lb/ft 2. However,not more than two employees shall occupy any platform at any one time.Maximum span between supports shall be eight feet.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) <T3>Window jack scaffolds.</T3> Not more than one employee shall occupya window jack scaffold at any one time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) <T3>Crawling boards (chicken ladders)</T3>. Crawling boards shall be notless than 10 inches wide and one inch thick, with cleats having a minimum1 x 1\1/2\ inch cross-sectional area. The cleats shall be equal in lengthto the width of the board and spaced at equal intervals not to exceed 24inches.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) <T3>Step, platform, and trestle ladder scaffolds.</T3> (1) The minimumdimensions of the side rails of the trestle ladder, or the base sectionsof the extension trestle ladder, shall be as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Ladders up to and including those 16 feet long shall have siderails of not less than 1\5/16\ x 2\3/4\ inch lumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Ladders over 16 feet long and up to and including those 20 feetlong shall have side rails of not less than 1\5/16\ x 3 inch lumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The side rails of the extension section of the extension trestleladder shall be parallel and shall have minimum dimensions as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Ladders up to and including 12 feet long shall have side railsof not less than 1\5/16\ x 2\1/4\ inch lumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Ladders over 12 feet long and up to and including those 16 feetlong shall have side rails of not less than 1\5/16\ x 2\1/2\ inch lumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Ladders over 16 feet long and up to and including those 20 feetlong shall have side rails of not less than 1\5/16\ x 2\3/4\ inch lumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Trestle ladders and base sections of extension trestle laddersshall be so spread that when in an open position the spread of the trestleat the bottom, inside to inside, shall be not less than five and one-halfinches per foot of the length of the ladder.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(k) <T3>Single-point adjustable suspension scaffolds.</T3> Maximum intendedload_250 lbs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Wood seats for boatswains' chairs shall be not less than one inchthick if made of non-laminated wood, or five-eighth inch thick if madeof marine quality plywood.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(l) <T3>Two-point adjustable suspension scaffolds.</T3> (1) In addition todirect connections to vessels, vessel sections, buildings (except windowcleaners' anchors), and structures, acceptable ways to prevent scaffoldsway include angulated roping and static lines. Angulated roping is a systemof platform suspension in which the upper wire rope sheaves or suspensionpoints are closer to the vertical plane of the vessel or building thanthe corresponding attachment points on the platform, thus causing the platformto press against the side of the vessel or face of the building. Staticlines are separate ropes secured at their top and bottom ends closer tothe vertical plane of the vessel or building than the outermost edge ofthe platform. By drawing the static line taut, the platform is drawn againstthe side of the vessel or face of the building.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) On suspension scaffolds designed for a working load of 500 pounds,no more than two employees shall be permitted on the scaffold at one time.On suspension scaffolds with a working load of 750 pounds, no more thanthree employees shall be permitted on the scaffold at one time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Ladder-type platforms. The side stringer shall be of clear straight-grainedspruce. The rungs shall be of straight-grained oak, ash, or hickory, atleast one and one-eighth inches in diameter, with seven-eighth inch tenonsmortised into the side stringers at least seven-eighth inch. The stringersshall be tied together with tie rods not less than one-fourth inch in diameter,passing through the stringers and riveted up tight against washers on bothends. The flooring strips shall be spaced not more than five-eighth inchapart, except at the side rails where the space may be one inch. Ladder-typeplatforms shall be constructed in accordance with the following table:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>A-11._<T4>Minimum Dimensions for Ladder-Type Platforms</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Length of platform<D>12 ft</D><D>14 andamp; 16 ft</D><D>18 andamp; 20 ft.</D></ITAG>Side stringers, minimum cross section finished sizes:<ITAG tagnum="2">At ends<D>1\3/4\ x 2\3/4\ in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 2\3/4\ in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 3 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At middle<D>1\3/4\ x 3\3/4\ in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 3\3/4\ in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 4 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reinforcing strip (minimum)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="27">A \1/8\ x \7/8\ inch steel reinforcing strip shall be attached tothe side or underside, full length.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rungs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="27">Rungs shall be 1\1/8\ inch minimum diameter with at least \7/8\ inchin diameter tenons, and the maximum spacing shall be 12 inches to center.</ITAG>Tie rods:<ITAG tagnum="2">Number (minimum)<D>3</D><D>4</D><D>4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Diameter (minimum)<D>\1/4\ in</D><D>\1/4\ in</D><D>\1/4\ in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Flooring, minimum finished size<D>\1/2\ in x 2\3/4\ in</D><D>\1/2\ x 2\3/4\ in</D><D>\1/2\ x 2\3/4\.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table A-12._</T4><T4>Minimum Dimensions for Ladder-Type Platforms</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Length of platform<D>22 and 24 ft</D><D>28 and 30 ft.</D></ITAG>Side stringers, minimum cross section (finished sizes):<ITAG tagnum="2">At ends<D>1\3/4\ in x 3 in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 3\1/2\.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">At middle<D>1\3/4\ x 4\1/4\ in</D><D>1\3/4\ x 5 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reinforcing strip (minimum)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="27">A \1/8\ x \7/8\-inch steel reinforcing strip shall be attached tothe side or underside, full length.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rungs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="27">Rungs shall be 1\1/8\-inch minimum diameter with at least \7/8\ inchin diameter tenons, and the maximum spacing shall be 12 inches to center.</ITAG>Tie rods:<ITAG tagnum="2">Number (minimum)<D>5</D><D>6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Diameter (minimum)<D>\1/4\ in</D><D>\1/4\ in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Flooring, minimum finished size<D>\1/2\ x 2\3/4\ in</D><D>\1/2\ x 2\3/4\ in. </D></ITAG></ITAG>(4) Plank-Type Platforms. Plank-type platforms shall be composed of notless than nominal 2 x 8 inch unspliced planks, connected together on theunderside with cleats at intervals not exceeding four feet, starting sixinches from each end. A bar or other effective means shall be securelyfastened to the platform at each end to prevent the platform from slippingoff the hanger. The span between hangers for plank-type platforms shallnot exceed 10 feet.(5) Beam-Type Platforms. Beam platforms shall have side stringers of lumbernot less than 2 x 6 inches set on edge. The span between hangers shallnot exceed 12 feet when beam platforms are used. The flooring shall besupported on 2 x 6 inch cross beams, laid flat and set into the upper edgeof the stringers with a snug fit, at intervals of not more than four feet,securely nailed in place. The flooring shall be of 1 x 6 inch materialnailed to the cross beams. Floor-boards shall not be spaced more than one-halfinch apart.(m) <T3>Multi-point adjustable suspension scaffolds.</T3> No specific guidelinesor tables are given for these scaffolds.(n) <T3>Catenary scaffolds.</T3> (1) Maximum intended load_500 lbs.(2) Not more than two employees shall be permitted on the scaffold at onetime.(3) Maximum capacity of comealong shall be 2,000 lbs.(4) Vertical pickups shall be spaced not more than 50 feet apart.(o) <T3>Float (ship) scaffolds.</T3> (1) Maximum intended load_750 lbs.(2) Platforms shall be made of three-fourth inch plywood, equivalent inrating to American Plywood Association Grade B-B, Group I, Exterior.(3) Bearers shall be made from 2 x 4 inch, or 1 x 10 inch rough lumber.They shall be free of knots and other flaws.(p) <T3>Interior hung scaffolds.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,i1,s75,xs52</C><T4>Table </T4>A-13<T4>_Minimum Dimensions For Interior Hung Scaffolds</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Bearers (use on edge)<D>2 x 10 in.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum intended load<D>Maximum span.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">25 lb/ft\2\<D>10 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">50 lb/ft\2\<D>10 ft.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75 lb/ft\2\<D>7 ft.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-27003 Filed 11-28-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>